






http://web.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Protocols_of_the_Elders_of_Zion#Stolypin.27s_fraud_investigation.2C_1905
	Emergence in Russia

	The chapter "In the Jewish Cemetery in Prague" from Goedsche's Biarritz, with its strong anti-semitic theme containing the alleged rabbinical plot against the European civilization, was translated into Russian as a separate pamphlet in 1872.[13] Okhranka, the tsarist secret police, found these works useful in their effort to discredit liberal reformers and revolutionaries who were rapidly gaining popular support, especially among oppressed minorities such as Russian Jews.

	Recent research by Russian historian Mikhail Lepekhine traced the Protocols to Matvei Golovinski, agent provocateur of Okhranka, as part of a scheme to persuade Tsar Nicholas II that the modernization of Russia was really a Jewish plot to control the world. Lepekhine discovered Golovinski's authorship in Russia's long-closed archives and published his findings in November 1999 in the French newsweekly L'Express.[14] Golovinski had been linked to the work before; the German writer Konrad Heiden identified him as an author of the Protocols in 1944.[15] Golovinski worked together with Charles Joly (son of Maurice Joly) at Le Figaro in Paris, writing articles at the direction of Pyotr Rachkovsky, Chief of the Russian secret service. During the Dreyfus Affair in France, when polarization of European attitudes towards the Jews was at its height, the publication began private circulation as The Protocols in 1897.[16] After the 1917 revolution, Golovinski became a Bolshevik propagandist.

	...Stolypin's fraud investigation, 1905

	A subsequent secret investigation ordered by the newly appointed chairman of the Council of Ministers Pyotr Stolypin came to conclusion that the Protocols first appeared in Paris in antisemitic circles around 1897–1898.[22] When Nicholas II learned of the results of this investigation, he requested: "The Protocols should be confiscated, a good cause cannot be defended by dirty means."[23] Despite the order, or because of the "good cause," numerous reprints proliferated.[20]


I guess this is where it came from

Stolypin independently traced to Paris

others blame Rachkovski directly

I guess Rachkovski ordered it, Golovinski wrote it?


https://books.google.com/books?id=g4hixDZdqL0C&pg=PA211&lpg=PA211
	Burtsev, the investigative journalist well known for his spy exposures in the decade before the revolution, completed his book on the Protocols that appeared in 1938. He devotes much of it to line-by-line comparisons--which go well beyond the examples of the parallel wording listed by The Times' reporter Graves in 1921--to prove that the Protocols are based on Joly's 1864 satire.


Burtsev--man after my own heart

	
	In the remaining pages, he comments on what happened once the Protocols were fabricated.

	He testifies, for example, that one of the last Okhranka chiefs, S.P. Beletsky, told him in 1918 that he had never considered injecting the Protocols into the trial of Beilis, the Jew charged with ritual murder in 1911-13. Quoting a conversation that took place when the two men shared a Bolshevik jail cell, Burtsev remembers these words of Beletsky: "Although several persons proposed to us to use the 'Zionist Protocols,' we fully understood that this meant destruction of the entire case. They were such an obvious forgery." Burtsev similarly quotes former Okhranka agent Manasevich-Manuilov, whom Princess Radziwill alleged in 1921 to have worked on the Protocols. This time remembering a private conversation from before the revolution, Burtsev recounts that Manuilov dismissively referred to the Protocols as a psuedo-document that "only an idiot could believe."


Protocols early example of fake news?

Mix the truth with falsehoods, and the truth gets buried.


	Burtsev also quotes a written statement that he solicited in 1934 from a former Okhranka official who claimed to have investigated the Protocols for Stolypin in 1908. This official, identified as "Globychev," a one-time cheif of the St Petersburg Okhranka, would appear to be the general who took command of the capital Okhranika in Feburary 1919-Major-General K.I. Globachev.

	According to Globachev, an unnamed but opportunistic Foreign Agency agent in Paris drafted the Protocols sometime between 1896 and 1900, the latter being the year in which, "unbeknownst to his immediate superior" (this phrase absolves Rachkovsky, then head of the Foreign Agency), he forwarded his forgery to a St Petersburg Okhranka official named Colonel Piramidov.


Dunno about Globachev, I think also says from his "eyewitness account" that Okhrana had nothing to do with putting Bolsheviks in power http://www.sunypress.edu/p-6434-the-truth-of-the-russian-revolu.aspx


https://muse.jhu.edu/chapter/1968785
	...Now that quite a bit of time has transpired since the February 1917 revolution , many ask the question, “Is it true that Germany participated in its preparation?” I positively reject this idea. Germany participated in neither the revolution nor the preparation of it. The revolution was an unexpected pleasant surprise to Germany. 


seems off? you'd think if he were heading Okhrana he'd be reading the Foreign Ministry's telegrams

	All military, political, and economic data on Russia were received by Germany from German nationals in Russia—that is, from German commercial firms, financial and manufacturing enterprises, commercial travelers, and so on ...Only a minority were Russian citizens who worked for Germany for material gain, and this was mainly on our western borders.


written in 1922 (http://www.thebeaconnewspapers.com/russian-revolution-memoirs/) wouldn't he know about Parvus by then?


https://books.google.com/books?id=yNiqDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA128&lpg=PA128
	...Thus, the Central Powers, having lost the basis of their intelligence on Russia, had no chance for influencing public sentiment in Russia in hopes of aiding a revolution. The only way that the Central Powers were involved in these matters was in assisting our revolutionary emigrants in spreading propaganda among Russian prisoners in concentration camps in Germany and Austria, and in supporting the Russian expatriate movement that had begun in 1915 by Socialist Party leaders.


they were more involved than that


	But these efforts bore their own fruit after the February Revolution , when it pleased the Provisional Government to allow this flock of crows, our emigrants, to pour into Russia across the long open borders of neutral countries. It is completely natural that, along with them, Russia was covered anew with a network of German espionage. As far as any allied preparation for a revolution, I positively reject that. Some say that England supposedly helped our revolutionary center to overthrow the government through the aid of its ambassador Sir George Buchanan. I assert that throughout the war neither Buchanan nor any English national had any active involvement in our revolutionary movement, or in the revolution itself. It is possible that Buchanan and other Britons had personal sympathy for the revolutionary mood in Russia, thinking that a national army created by the revolution would be more patriotic and could smash the Central Powers—but not more than that. This view was created in Russian society as a result of the close relationship of the English ambassador with Sazonov, who was an avid Anglophile and affiliated with the Progressive Bloc, and other leaders of the revolutionary frame of mind, such as Miliukov, Guchkov, and others.


interesting he'd say that


	It is not even worthwhile to talk about France. Neither the ambassador nor any French allowed themselves to interfere in Russia’s internal affairs.

	Russian hands created the February Revolution in Russia. We already know whose hands these were, and who it was who needed a revolution. The revolution was needed by a small group of people of the Kadet Party and progressives, who affiliated themselves with the movement and who for the last two years had shouted about the need for a Russian government that could be trusted by the people--a government selected by themselves. The revolution was also needed by the socialists as the ultimate completion of their party program--that is, to overthrow the existing government.

	...who knew all these, the Chernovs, Nekrasovs, Avkensteevs, Perevzeves, and th elike? Did the Russian people know anything of them? They were known only for their criminal politics and activities to the Department of Police and to the officials of the Special Corps of Gendarmes.

	So, in essence, the order to take power into their hands and give Russia a government that supposedly would have the people's trust, the February Revolution brough Russia all the turmoil that followed. We do not see the end of our homeland's misfortune, and it may be that the present regime will bring her to her final ruin.

	History will have to record that those who commited this dark criminal act wer enot the initiators of an ephermerl revolutionary victory, as they proudly proclaimed, but supreme criminals acting against their own homeland.


well he's right about some things


https://books.google.com/books?id=yNiqDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA128&lpg=PA128

writing on Burtsev interesting

maybe not completely false, kindof funny, but missing some things. Burtsev did give them problems (exposing Azef for one). Writes Burtsev off as well meaning but nutty.

If Globachev a liar, is a good one.


doesn't seem to be a mention of Malinovsky in his memiors?


https://books.google.com/books?id=g4hixDZdqL0C&pg=PA211&lpg=PA211
	...Although Manasevich-Manuilov and others then commenced efforts to channel the forgery to the tsar, testifies Globachev, success came only in 1905 through D.F. Trepov (who became court commander in November 1905) and V.F. Dzhunkovsky, at the time assistant to the governor of Moscow province.

	Nicholas II, claims Globachev, found the Protocols plausible; he did so just as a surge of anti-Semetic disinformation from such right-wing groups as the Union of the Russian people coincided with a terrible outbreak of pogroms. Faced with a tract that was very likely yet more such disinformation, Stolypin ordered an investigation of the Protocols in 1906. The resulting report by two Gendarme officers, identified by Globachev as Martynov and Vasiliev, labelled the Protocols fraudulent and cited, as support, testimony to that effected recieved from Rataev in paris and Harting in Berlin (both held those Foreign Agency postings only until July 1906). Upon reading that report, the tsar purportedly issued this order: "Get rid of the 'Protocols.' It is impossible to defend something sacred by dirty methods."

	All these various facts became known to Globachev, he says, during his own inquiry in 1908, also ordered by Stolypin; although Burtsev relates no reason from Globachev for that second probe, it would have followed the 1907 publication of the Protocols by the Union of the Russian People's spokesman, Butmi. As for his own summation of the Protocols, Globachev found them a fake and ruled out the involvement of any high officials.


I guess Globachev's account is the Protocols were a minor prank from a few low-level Okhrana agents


	Burtsev himself agreed that the Protocols had been forged but held high officials fully responsible. He retells and endorses the details of origin related by Princess Radziwill in 1921 - as he does her explanation of the reworking of the 1881 manuscript in 1905 by Golovinsky at the behest of Rachkovsky. He offers no proof for any of these details. His justification for accepting them as truth, rather, was his own conviction that top policy-makers in the Department of Police consistently sought to exploit endemic anti-Semitism in their campaign against revolutionists.


http://www.sscnet.ucla.edu/soc/groups/scr/kellogg.pdf
	Cohn provides substantial information on the origins and spread of the Protocols.  

	...Cohn believes that Piotr Rachkovsky, the head of the Okhrana, or Imperial Russian secret police abroad, fabricated the Protocols in French in Paris and transmitted them to a Russian monk named Sergei Nilus. 41 James Webb, author of The Occult Establishment , on the other hand, notes that the Protocols castigate Finance Minister Sergei Witte’s modernizing policies in general and the introduction of the gold standard in particular, and he argues that Rachkovsky was not likely to attack his own government deliberately. 42 Hagemeister, an expert on the Protocols , has recently stressed that the origins of the Protocols are unknown to this day and that while Rachkovsky was likely somehow involved, this supposition remains unproved. It is also not known how the Protocols made their way from France to Russia and into the hands of Nilus. 


"Fontanka 16" authors a bit misleading in their approach to the charge that Rachkovsky forged the Protocols. Cohn's work would have been available to them by the time of writing.

they frame it as an argument between Golovinsky and Burtsev, and seem to take Golovinsky's view of both the origins of the protocols and Burtsev


https://books.google.com/books?id=g4hixDZdqL0C&pg=PA211&lpg=PA211
	...By casting a blanket of blame on Jews for political agitation, labour strikes, and revolutionary terrorism, the police imaged they could stir Russians more effectively to become passionate supporters of the tsar. The Protocols, argues Burtsev, fitted perfectly into that design: they portrayed the Jews as conspiring to rule the world by internally ruining all existing social orders through every possible disruptive means, whether political, economic, or religious.



http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
    A map of the course of the Symbolic Snake is shown as follows: - Its first stage in Europe was in 429B.C. in Greece... The seventh in St. Petersburg, over which is drawn the head of the Snake underthe date of 1881. [This "Snake" is now being drawn through the Americas and in the United States ofAmerica, it is been partially identified as the "Counsel on Foreign Relations" (C.F.R.) and the "Tri-Lateral Commission"].


Tsar Alexander II assassinated in 1881, Okhrana formed shorted after


    All these States which the Snake traversed have had the foundations of their constitutions shaken,Germany, with its apparent power, forming no exception to the rule. In economic conditions, Englandand Germany are spared, but only till the conquest of Russia is accomplished by the Snake, on whichat present [i.e., 1905] all its efforts are concentrated. 


self-reference?

this is from a forward added later in 1905


------


http://web.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Protocols_of_the_Elders_of_Zion#Emergence_in_Russia
	The Protocols enjoyed another wave of popularity in Russia after 1905, when progressive political elements in Russia succeeded in creating a constitution and a parliament, the Duma. The reactionary Union of the Russian People, known as the Black Hundreds, together with the Okhranka, the Tsarist secret police, blamed this liberalization on the "International Jewish conspiracy," and began a program of disseminating the Protocols as propaganda to support the wave of pogroms that swept Russia in 1903–1906 and as a tool to deflect attention from social activism. It also was of interest to Tsar Nicholas II, who was fearful of modernization and protective of his monarchy, and he presented the growing revolutionary movement as part of a powerful world conspiracy, blaming the Jews for Russia's problems.


Okhrana and black hundreds distributing among Russian right early


	The Protocols are claimed to have been published at the earliest, in serialized form, from August 28 to September 7 (O.S.), in 1903, in Znamya (Знамя - The Banner), a Saint Petersburg daily newspaper, under Pavel Krushevan. However, no known library in the United States or Great Britain appears to have a copy of this newspaper. Krushevan had initiated the Kishinev pogrom four months earlier.[20]


maybe published in Russia in 1903


	In 1905, self-proclaimed mystic priest Sergei Nilus gained fame by publishing the full text of the Protocols in Chapter XII, the twelfth and final chapter (pages 305-417), of the second edition (some say third) of his book, Velikoe v malom i antikhrist] (The Great within the Small: The Coming of the Anti-Christ and the Rule of Satan on Earth). He claimed it was the work of the First Zionist Congress, held eight years earlier in Basel, Switzerland. When it was pointed out that the First Zionist Congress had been open to the public and was attended by many non-Jews, Nilus changed his story, saying the Protocols were the work of the 1902–1903 meetings of the Elders, but contradicting his own prior statement that he had received his copy in 1901:

	    In 1901, I succeeded through an acquaintance of mine (the late Court Marshal Alexei Nikolayevich Sukotin of Chernigov) in getting a manuscript that exposed with unusual perfection and clarity the course and development of the secret Jewish Freemasonic conspiracy, which would bring this wicked world to its inevitable end. The person who gave me this manuscript guaranteed it to be a faithful translation of the original documents that were stolen by a woman from one of the highest and most influential leaders of the Freemasons at a secret meeting somewhere in France—the beloved nest of Freemasonic conspiracy.[21]

	Nilus also had a personal motivation for publishing them. At the time he was trying to become the royal couple's confessor and brought his book to the Tsar's attention with the help of the Grand Duchess Elizaveta Fyodorovna. This was part of a faction fight against Papus and Nizier Anthelme Philippe at the Tsarist court. (Indeed, Papus was accused in 1920 of having forged the Protocols to discredit Philippe.)


says Nilus changed his story about how he got it

article is a bit weird about it


	...The Russian Revolution and the spread of the Protocols, 1920s

	After the Russian Revolution, factions connected to the White movement used the Protocols to perpetrate hatred and violence against the Jews. Since Karl Marx and other prominent Marxists were Jewish, some opponents of the Bolshevik movement considered it a Jewish conspiracy for world domination. Some top Bolsheviks, particularly Leon Trotsky, were Jews, sparking a worldwide interest in the Protocols.


distributed among whites after Russian revolution

ended up with a lot of bolshevik opposition being racist.


	German language publication

	The first and "by far the most important"[24] German translation was by Gottfried Zur Beck, (pseudonym for Ludwig Müller von Hausen). It appeared in January 1920 as a part of a larger antisemitic tract[25] dated 1919. After The Times of London discussed the book respectfully in May 1920 it became a bestseller. "The Hohenzollern family helped defray the publication costs, and Kaiser Wilhelm II had portions of the book read out aloud to dinner guests".[26]

	Alfred Rosenberg's 1923 edition[27] "gave a forgery a huge boost".[26]


Willhelm II read to guests, Rosenberg wrote an edition that gave it a "huge boost."


https://books.google.com/books?id=g4hixDZdqL0C&pg=PA210&lpg=PA210
	...it is relevant here to cite the offer that young Nilus would make four years later in a letter addressed to Nazi leader Alfred Rosenberg, the future commisar of Germany's Eastern Occupied Territories and a spokesman for Nazi racist ideas. As a resident of Poland, in March 1940 you Nilus would volunteer to provide assistance to Rosenberg in his handling of the Jews - and it is hard to imagine that young Nilus hoped to make life easier for them.


interesting, Nilus' son reached out to Rosenberg


------

http://web.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Protocols_of_the_Elders_of_Zion#cite_ref-27
	On May 8, 1920, an article[28] in The Times followed the German translation, appealing for an inquiry into what it called "uncanny note of prophecy."



some Western MSM journalists gave them a boost


http://web.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Protocols_of_the_Elders_of_Zion#cite_ref-27
	In 1920, the history of the concepts found in the Protocols was traced back to the works of Goedsche and Joly by Lucien Wolf; was published in London in August 1921; and was similarly exposed in the series of articles in The Times by its Constantinople reporter, Philip Graves, who took his information from Wolf's work.

	According to writer Peter Grose, Allen Dulles, who was in Constantinople developing relationships in post-Ottoman political structures, discovered 'the source' of the documentation ultimately provided to The Times. Grose writes that The Times extended a loan to the source, a Russian émigré who refused to be identified, with the understanding the loan would not be repaid.[32]


Allen Dulles involved in later efforts showing protocols a forgery

funny

If I remember right, some efforts showing them a forgery were curiously sloppy


https://books.google.com/books?id=5Y7UDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA245&lpg=PA245

Burtsev said to have been convincing at Berne



------


http://web.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Protocols_of_the_Elders_of_Zion#cite_ref-27
	Arab lands, 1920s

	In the 1920s, the Protocols occasionally appeared in the Arab polemics linking Zionism and Bolshevism. The first Arabic translations were made from the French by Arab Christians. The first translation was published in Raqib Sahyun, a periodical of the Roman Catholic community of Jerusalem, in 1926. Another translation made by an Arab Christian appeared in Cairo in 1927 or 1928, this time as a book. The first translation by an Arab Muslim was also published in Cairo, but only in 1951.[37]


I think a version of them was on Assad's website

	 South Africa

	In an August 1934 case in Grahamstown, South Africa, the court imposed fines totalling £1,775 (about $8,875 at the time or about $130,000 in 2005 dollars) on three men for disseminating a version of the Protocols.


got distributed pretty widely even after forgery proofs

	
	The Protocols in Nazi propaganda, 1930s-1940s

	The Protocols also became a part of the Nazi propaganda effort to justify persecution of the Jews. It was made required reading for German students. In The Holocaust: The Destruction of European Jewry 1933-1945, Nora Levin states that "Hitler used the Protocols as a manual in his war to exterminate the Jews":

	    Despite conclusive proof that the Protocols were a gross forgery, they had sensational popularity and large sales in the 1920s and 1930s. They were translated into every language of Europe and sold widely in Arab lands, the United States, and England. But it was in Germany after World War I that they had their greatest success. There they were used to explain all of the disasters that had befallen the country: the defeat in the war, the hunger, the destructive inflation.[39]

	Hitler refers to the Protocols in Mein Kampf:

	    … To what extent the whole existence of this people is based on a continuous lie is shown incomparably by the Protocols of the Wise Men of Zion, so infinitely hated by the Jews. They are based on a forgery, the Frankfurter Zeitung moans and screams once every week: the best proof that they are authentic.


the main weakness of conspiracy theorists

not such a complex thing to exploit


	    […] the important thing is that with positively terrifying certainty they reveal the nature and activity of the Jewish people and expose their inner contexts as well as their ultimate final aims.[40]

	Hitler endorsed it in his speeches from August 1921 on, and it was studied in German classrooms after Nazis came to power. At the height of World War II, the Nazi Propaganda Minister Joseph Goebbels proclaimed: "The Zionist Protocols are as up-to-date today as they were the day they were first published."[26] In Norman Cohn's words, it served as the Nazis' "warrant for genocide."


a lot of damage for one document

good book on this: http://bookfi.net/dl/548070/5d8658


	Fascist Italy

	In the wake of the growing alliance between Hitler's Germany and Fascist Italy, the Protocols were published in Italy in 1937, with an introduction by Julius Evola.


but of course


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Julius_Evola
    ...Evola took seriously a number of antisemitic canards and argued that the anti-Jewish and anti-Masonic forgery The Protocols of Zion, which he believed to be true in principle if not specifically, accurately reflected the conditions of modernity.


for some reason, a decent amount of sketchy people say the same thing, something like "the protocols might be a forgery, but you can see they accurately describe the world"


although maybe true

depending on your definition of the word "accurate"


http://web.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Protocols_of_the_Elders_of_Zion#cite_ref-27
	 Contemporary usage and popularity

	While there is continued popularity of The Protocols in nations from South America to Asia, since the defeat of Nazi Germany and fascist Italy in the Second World War governments or political leaders in most parts of the world have generally avoided claims that The Protocols represent factual evidence of a real Jewish conspiracy. The exception to this is the Middle East, where a large number of Arab and Muslim regimes and leaders have endorsed them as authentic.

	Past endorsements of The Protocols from Presidents Gamal Abdel Nasser and Anwar Sadat of Egypt, King Faisal of Saudi Arabia, and Colonel Muammar al-Gaddafi of Libya, among other political and intellectual leaders of the Arab world, are echoed by twenry-first century endorsements from the Grand Mufti of Jerusalem Sheikh Ekrima Sa'id Sabri and Hamas to the education ministry of Saudi Arabia.[41]

	 Middle East

	As Arab-Israeli conflict heated up in the years following its creation in 1947, many Arab governments funded new printings of the Protocols, and taught them in their schools as historical fact. They have been accepted as such by many Islamist organizations, such as Hamas and Islamic Jihad. Reportedly, Arabic editions issued in the Middle East were found on sale as far away as London.[42] There are at least nine different Arabic translations of the Protocols and more editions than in any other language except German.[43] The Protocols also figure prominently in the anti-semitic propaganda distrubted internationally by the Arab countries and have spread to other Muslim countries, such as Pakistan, Malaysia, and Indonesia.[44]
	Syria

	The Protocols is a best-seller in Syria[45] and, together with other antisemitic materials published there, is distributed throughout the Arab world.[46] In 1997, the two-volume eighth edition of the Protocols, translated and edited by 'Ajaj Nuwayhid, was published by Mustafa Tlass's publishing house and exhibited and sold at the Damascus International Book Fair (IBF) and at the Cairo IBF. At the 2005 Cairo IBF a stand of the Syrian publisher displayed a new edition of the Protocols authorized by the Syrian Ministry of Information.[47][48] The 2005 Syrian edition includes an "historical and contemporary investigative study" that repeats the blood libel among other antisemitic accusations, and argues that the Torah and Talmud encourage Jews "to commit treason and to conspire, dominate, be arrogant and exploit other countries." ITC CSS In Syria government-controlled television channels occasionally broadcast mini-series concerning the Protocols of the Elders of Zion, along with several other anti-semitic themes.[49]
	Egypt

	During the presidency of Gamal Abdel Nasser, Egypt was the main source of internationally distributed antisemitic propaganda. In 1960, the Protocols were featured in an artcile published by Salah Dasuqi, military governor of Cairo, in al-Majallaaa, the official cultural journal.[50] In 1965, the Egyptian government released an English-language pamphlet titled Israel, the Enemy of Africa and distrubted it throughout the English-speaking countries of Africa. The pamphlet used the Protocols and The International Jew as its sources and concluded that all the Jews were cheats, thieves, and murdererers.[44]

	In a foreword to a translation of Shimon Peres' book The New Middle East, the Egyptian state-owned publisher al-Ahram editorialized in 1995:

	    When The Protocols of the Elders of Zion were discovered, some 200 years ago, and translated in various languages, including Arabic, the World Zionist Organization attempted to deny the existence of the plot, and claimed forgery. The Zionists even endeavoured to purchase all the existing copies, in order to prevent their circulation. But today, Shimon Peres proves unequivocally that the Protocols are authentic, and that they tell the truth.

	An article in the Egyptian state-owned newspaper al-Akhbar on February 3, 2002 stated:

	    All the evils that currently affect the world are the doings of Zionism. This is not surprising, because the Protocols of the Elders of Zion, which were established by their wise men more than a century ago, are proceeding according to a meticulous and precise plan and time schedule, and they are proof that even though they are a minority, their goal is to rule the world and the entire human race."


big in the Middle East now

taught to children in schools


	...Iranian writer and researcher Ali Baqeri, who researched the Protocols, finds their plan for world domination to be merely part of an even more grandiose scheme, saying in Sobh in 1999:

	    "The ultimate goal of the Jews … after conquering the globe… is to extract from the hands of the Lord many stars and galaxies." 


Intergalactic Jewish conquest?


------


https://books.google.com/books?id=zK1ACwAAQBAJ&pg=PA178&lpg=PA178
	In Britain, initial reactions to The Protocls were very mixed. Unsurprisingly, H.A. Gwynne of the Morning Post described them as 'a most masterly exposition.' One correspondent for The Times, while admitting they might be a forgery, claimed that they offered a credible account of Jewish influence in Russia since 1905. However, in the same paper, on 8 May 1920, under the headline 'A disturbing Pamphlet: A call for INquiry', the paper asked 'What are these Protocols? Are they authentic? If so, what malevolent assembly concocted these plans, and gloated over their exposition?'


good question!


------

The protocols comes off as another blame-shifting trick

Okhrana (or elments in Okhrana) forged them, then used them to blame Bolshevik revolution on Jews after themselves directing Bolshevik revolution

did another favor for them: Okhrana distributed it among Bolshevik opposition, and so much of their opposition could be discredited as loony racists

but there is another thing it does for them, maybe more subtle but important: it lays out techniques similar to "subversion" as described by Bezmenov, Dulles plan, other resources on active measures while simultaneously being virulently racist, loony, and obviously forged. I think has the effect of people who read it and show it a forgery end up throwing out baby with bathwater...


------


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf


starts off with forward on Victor Marsden, Morning Post journalist said to have been author of this english translation.

	He told the writer of this Preface that he could not stand more than an hour at a time of his work on it in the British Museum, as the diabolical spirit of the matter which he was obliged to turn into English made him positively ill.


says protocols so spooky that Marsden got ill from demonic spirit while writing it

I guess adds to allure?

or someone was aiming a microwave at his head


	...Mr. Marsden's literary touch reveals the thread running through the twenty-four Protocols.It may be said with truth that this work was carried out at the cost of Mr. Marsden's own life's blood.

	...Mr. Marsden's connection with the MORNING POST was not severed by his return to England, andhe was well enough to accept the post of special correspondent of that journal in the suite of H.R.H.,the Prince of Wales on his Empire tour. From this he returned with the Prince, apparently in muchbetter health, but within a few days of his landing he was taken suddenly ill, and died after a very brief illness.

	May this work be his crowning monument!


I guess really is saying he died from translating protocols

kindof sounds like a tabloid

want to target superstitious people? I guess these sorts of things work as a seive for suckers, the greatest resource for manipulative people



------

http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	...The presumption is strong that the Protocols were issued, or reissued, at the First Zionist Congressheld at Basle in 1897 under the presidency of the Father of Modern Zionism, the late Theodore Herzl. There has been recently published a volume of Herzl's "Diaries," a translation of some passages which appeared in the JEWISH CHRONICLE of July 14, 1922.

	Herzl gives an account of his first visit to England in 1895, and his conversation with Colonel Goldsmid, a Jew brought up as a Christian, an officer in the English Army, and at heart a JewNationalist all the time. Goldsmid suggested to Herzl that the best way of expropriating the Englisharistocracy, and so destroying their power to protect the people of England against Jew domination,was to put excessive taxes on the land. Herzl thought this an excellent idea, and it is now to be founddefinitely embodied in Protocol VI!    The above extract from Herzl's DIARY is an extremely significant bit of evidence bearing on theexistence of the Jew World Plot and authenticity of the Protocols,


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Theodor_Herzl
	As the Paris correspondent for Neue Freie Presse, Herzl followed the Dreyfus affair, a political scandal that divided the Third French Republic from 1894 until its resolution in 1906. It was a notorious antisemitic incident in France in which a Jewish French army captain was falsely convicted of spying for Germany. Herzl was witness to mass rallies in Paris following the Dreyfus trial.


member of press, covered Dreyfus affair, which apparently was when protocols first appeared


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dreyfus_affair
	The affair from 1894 to 1906 divided France deeply and lastingly into two opposing camps: the pro-Army, mostly Catholic "anti-Dreyfusards" and the anticlerical, pro-republican Dreyfusards. It embittered French politics and encouraged radicalization.


iirc dreyfus affair of interest to Okhrana

would be worth looking at how Herzl reported on it


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Theodor_Herzl
	According to Henry Wickham Steed, Herzl was initially "fanatically devoted to the propagation of Jewish-German 'Liberal' assimilationist doctrine".[21] However, Herzl came to reject his early ideas regarding Jewish emancipation and assimilation and to believe that the Jews must remove themselves from Europe.[22] Herzl grew to believe that antisemitism could not be defeated or cured, only avoided, and that the only way to avoid it was the establishment of a Jewish state.[23]


Steed, guy who wondered if protocols are true, slammed Herzl in press.

Herzl ideas not so great, though understandable at the time.


	Beginning in late 1895, Herzl wrote Der Judenstaat (The State of the Jews), which was published February 1896 to immediate acclaim and controversy. The book argued that the Jewish people should leave Europe if they wished to, either for Argentina or, preferably, for Palestine, their historic homeland. The Jews possessed a nationality; all they were missing was a nation and a state of their own.[26] Only through a Jewish state could they avoid antisemitism, express their culture freely and practice their religion without hindrance.[26] Herzl’s ideas spread rapidly throughout the Jewish world and attracted international attention.[27] Supporters of existing Zionist movements, such as the Hovevei Zion, immediately allied themselves with him, but establishment Jewry vilified him and considered his ideas as a threat to their attempts at integration and a rebellion against God.


Herzl's ideas gained popularity, but not with everyone

worth noting that the Okhrana's pogroms would have made this idea more popular with Jews


https://books.google.com/books?id=Litr5ENSmfUC&pg=PA365&lpg=PA365
	How The Protocols of the Elders of Zion came into existence is even more obscure than the hidden details of the Dreyfus Affair. And yet, for all the many theories about the provenance of the forged document, with its cunning representation of anarchists, socialists, Masons and liberals as the dupes of a diabolic Jewish plot, its roots clearly lie in the world over which Rachovsky presided. It is not only the contemporary allusions that point to such a conclusion: the construction of the Paris Metro, for example, or the document's own claim to be the secret agendy of the first Zionist Congress, organised in BGasel in the summer of 1896 by Theodor Herzl and Max Nordau, whose secret lover was the Okhrana agent Madame Novikoff. Nor is it the employement in the Okhrana's Paris offices at the time of the skilled forger Matvei Golovinsky, who like Rachovsky and his loyal French agent Btin was an old member of the Holy Brotherhood.

	...When Herzl witnessed the humiliation of Captain Dreyfus in 1895, it was the visceral anti-Semetic hated he saw and felt in the crowd that convinced him that only in a Jewish homeland could the safety of his race be guaranteed. At the time he cannot have guessed the sordid intrigues that had led to the scene, but still less can he have imagined the conspiracy that would be forged to demonise the Zionist movement he founded. Rochefort and Rachkovsky had both demonstrated, in their different ways, that they had few scruples when it came to settling scores and making their political points.


Herzl in on it or not? Either way, Okhrana was interested in him and his movement.



https://archive.org/stream/TheCompleteDiariesOfTheodorHerzl_201606/TheCompleteDiariesOfTheodorHerzlEngVolume1_OCR_djvu.txt
	Goldsmid gave an evasive answer, saying that naturally he 
	could dictate no one’s actions outside the Hovevei Zion. 

	I got up and said: 

	“I shall formulate Mr. Ish-Kishor’s question more precisely. 
	He means: does the Colonel regard my secret steps to be in any 
	way practical and to be taken seriously?”

	...I then declared that I could not abandon my stand on infiltra- 
tion even if I thereby lost the support of all the Hovevei Zion 
societies, which are now under a central organization. 


can see why he's target of conspiracy theories


	...The adherence of the Londoners is not enough for him. Sir 
	S. Montagu wanted to stand behind him, that he could well 
	understand. But as for Colonel Goldsmid, in a letter he had just 
	received Goldsmid had represented my undertaking as downright 
	dangerous. 

	This news staggered me greatly. I should never have expected 
	this from Goldsmid. If he is against me, why didn’t he tell me 
	so with military candor, why did he leave me confident and on 
	that Hovevei Zion evening expressly assure me of his sympathy 
	in my undertaking, provided that I was not being led astray in 
	Constantinople? 

	Colonel Goldsmid will no longer be counted upon. 


I guess he was trying to unite Zionist organizations, and there was a lot of intrigue going on


I think this is quote protocols introduction is referring to:


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	Herzl gives an account of his first visit to England in 1895, and his conversation with Colonel Goldsmid, a Jew brought up as a Christian, an officer in the English Army, and at heart a JewNationalist all the time. Goldsmid suggested to Herzl that the best way of expropriating the Englisharistocracy, and so destroying their power to protect the people of England against Jew domination,was to put excessive taxes on the land. Herzl thought this an excellent idea, and it is now to be founddefinitely embodied in Protocol VI!    The above extract from Herzl's DIARY is an extremely significant bit of evidence bearing on theexistence of the Jew World Plot and authenticity of the Protocols,


https://archive.org/stream/TheCompleteDiariesOfTheodorHerzl_201606/TheCompleteDiariesOfTheodorHerzlEngVolume1_OCR_djvu.txt
	With Goldsmid, I suddenly find myself in another world. 

	He wants to deliver the Holy Sepulchre to the Christians stone 
	by stone: part of it to Moscow, another part to Rome! 

	Like Montagu, he too thinks of a Greater Palestine. 

	A good idea of his is to hit landed property with a graduated tax


makes the author of preface look silly

reminds me a lot of fake news--you have to be a certain kind of person to take it seriously


	...The present successor of Herzl, as leader of the Zionist movement, Dr. Weizmann, quoted one ofthese sayings at the send-off banquet given to Chief Rabbi Hertz on October 6, 1920. The Chief Rabbiwas on the point of leaving for HIS Empire tour of H.R.H., the Prince of Wales. And this is the "saying"of the Sages which Dr. Weizmann quoted: "A beneficent protection which God has instituted in the lifeof the Jew is that He has dispersed him all over the world." (JEWISH GUARDIAN, Oct. 8, 1920.) Nowcompare this with the last clause of but one of Protocol XI. "God has granted to us, His Chosen People,the gift of dispersion, and from this, which appears to all eyes to be our weakness, has come forth allour strength, which has now brought us to the threshold of sovereignty over all the world." 

	The remarkable correspondence between these passages proves several things. It proves that theLearned Elders exist. It proves that Dr. Weizmann knows all about them. It proves that the desire for a"National Home" in Palestine is only camouflage and an infinitesimal part of the Jew's real object. Itproves that the Jews of the world have no intention of settling in Palestine or any separate country,and that their annual prayer that they may all meet "Next Year in Jerusalem" is merely a piece of theircharacteristic make-believe. It also demonstrates that the Jews are now a world menace, and that theAryan races will have to domicile them permanently out of Europe..


reaching a bit


	...In the year 1844, on the eve of the Jewish Revolution of 1848, Benjamin Disraeli, whose real namewas Israel, and who was a "damped," or baptized Jew, published his novel, CONINGSBY, in which occurs this ominous passage: "The world is governed by very different personages from what is imagined by those who are not behind the scenes." And he went on to show that these personages wereall Jews.


an interesting observation: say there were a world Jewish conspiracy close to what this doc describes. Then it would be more likely that this was written by them to discredit the idea than being written by someone trying to "expose" it. It would also put blame on the holocaust on this same shadowy group of "zionists."


	"The world is governed by very different personages from what is imagined by those who are not behind the scenes."


seems to be true, and if anyone knew this would be Okhrana

main problem with protocol's argument: naturally, the top criterion for ending up in this "behind the scenes" group is being evil and crafty, not Jewish 


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	The return of the head of the Snake to Zion can only be accomplished after the power of all the Sovereign o f Europe has been laid low, that is to say, when by means o f economic crises and wholesale destruction effected everywhere,


this eventually happened with WW II

	there sha ll ha ve been brought a bout a spiritual demoralization and a moral corruption, chiefly with the  assistance of Jewish w omen masquerading a s French, Italians, etc.. These are the surest spreaders of licentiousness into the lives of the leading men at the  heads of nations.


kindof weird it blames women

true this is a technique that could be used for influence, like Madame Novikoff and Max Nordau. Also weird things going with Moltke's wife and Kim Philby's wives.


http://articles.latimes.com/1999/oct/10/news/mn-20957

https://themoscowtimes.com/news/fugitive-russian-banker-claims-he-orchestrated-putins-accession-to-presidency-47710


and could be men pulling strings with powerful women too

protocols not just racist, sexist!

	   
	...A map of the course of the Symbolic Snake is shown as follows: - Its first stage in Europe was in 429B.C. in Greece, where, about the time of Pericles, the Snake first started eating into the power of thatcountry. The second stage was in Rome in the time of Augustus, about 69 B.C.. The third in Madrid inthe time of Charles V, in A.D. 1552. The fourth in Paris about 1790, in the time of Louis XVI. The fifthin London from 1814 onwards (after the downfall of Napoleon). The sixth in Berlin in 1871 after theFranco-Prussian war. The seventh in St. Petersburg, over which is drawn the head of the Snake underthe date of 1881. [This "Snake" is now being drawn through the Americas and in the United States ofAmerica, it is been partially identified as the "Counsel on Foreign Relations" (C.F.R.) and the "Tri-Lateral Commission"].


I guess listing a bunch of times subversives activities ruined states

conspiracy theories about the CFR and Tri-Lateral Comission are common in fake news today--turns out they are 100 years old


	...All these States which the Snake traversed have had the foundations of their constitutions shaken,Germany, with its apparent power, forming no exception to the rule. In economic conditions, Englandand Germany are spared, but only till the conquest of Russia is accomplished by the Snake, on whichat present [i.e., 1905] all its efforts are concentrated. The further course of the Snake is not shown onthis map, but arrows indicate its next movement towards Moscow, Kieft and Odessa


sortof predicted Russian revolution



------

http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	PROTOCOL No. 1    

	1. ....Putting aside fine phrases we shall speak of the significance of each thought: by comparisonsand deductions we shall throw light upon surrounding facts.    

	2. What I am about to set forth, then, is our system from the two points of view, that of ourselves and that of the GOYIM [i.e., non- Jews].    

	3. It must be noted that men with bad instincts are more in number than the good, and therefore the best results in governing them are attained by violence and terrorisation, and not by academic discussions. Every man aims at power, everyone would like to become a dictator if only he could, and rare indeed are the men who would not be willing to sacrifice the welfare of all for the sake of securing their own welfare.


"not by academic discussions"--r/the_donald a good example of that

a lot of their propaganda appeals to base insticts and "us v.s. them" mentality

like propaganda stirring up left v. right, none of it is about merits of their posititions, > half of it is pointing to examples of someone in left/right attacking the other side

they reduce politics to feelings instead of debate, discussion

Serbia before WWI a good example of "terrorisation"--Serbian gov was so afraid of Black Hand, who would conduct political assassinations, that they'd let them get away with anything, eventually leading to destruction of Serbia. IIRC, Pasic knew the Black Hand was responsible for assassinating Ferdinand, but was too afraid to tell it.

PLO activities in Jordan around Black September another example--they'd just take hostages and demand changes to Jordan government. They ended up getting different people in gov positions this way.

Is #3 what Okhrana actually believes? It shows in their methods, at least


	4. What has restrained the beasts of prey who are called men? What has served for their guidance hitherto?    

	5. In the beginnings of the structure of society, they were subjected to brutal and blind force; afterwords - to Law, which is the same force, only disguised. I draw the conclusion that by the law of nature right lies in force.


like "no law but law of the Jungle," as explained by this interesting guy:

http://archive.4plebs.org/pol/thread/81424689/#81424689
	We are not victims of the illusion of civil society and accept the law of the jungle.


could be another thing they actually believe

a problem with their logic: if people follow the law, things end up more or less nice and peaceful. If people follow their ideas, we get World War I and II


	6. Political freedom is an idea but not a fact. This idea one must know how to apply whenever it appears necessary with this bait of an idea to attract the masses of the people to one's party for the purpose of crushing another who is in authority. This task is rendered easier of the opponent has himself been infected with the idea of freedom, SO-CALLED LIBERALISM, and, for the sake of an idea, is willing to yield some of his power. It is precisely here that the triumph of our theory appears; the slackened reins of government are immediately, by the law of life, caught up and gathered together by a new hand, because the blind might of the nation cannot for one single day exist without guidance,and the new authority merely fits into the place of the old already weakened by liberalism.


I think this is saying that political freedom and liberalism (I guess here classical liberalism, freedom of speech and all that) is a weakness to be exploited by them.

One example of that is agents of influence in media of "open societies:" they can lie and use their influence to mess up societies and bring about regime change, as explained by Bezmenov. Bezmenov's account of what happened in India in combination with this (https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP86T00586R000400490007-7.pdf) probably serves as good example.

This might be why they look at classicial liberalism and civil rights with derision--it gives them freedom to do most of their influence operations.

King Hussein around Black September might be a good counterexample (but kindof weird since he was a Monarch)--he expressed concern for palestinian people and actions make him sound honest, made concessions and played his balancing act, and in the end Black September failed.

Seems weird to call this some secret cynical fact of life--if people actually believed and followed classical liberalism, most of their influence operations wouldn't work. Believe in liberalism and political freedom is more like an obstacle for them to work around and try to destroy than a weakness to exploit.

	
	7. In our day the power which has replaced that of the rulers who were liberal is the power of Gold. Time was when Faith ruled. The idea of freedom is impossible of realization because no one knows how to use it with moderation. It is enough to hand over a people to self-government for a certain length of time for that people to be turned into a disorganized mob. From that moment on we get internecine strife which soon develops into battles between classes, in the midst of which States burn down and their importance is reduced to that of a heap of ashes.


reminiscent of divide and conquer to use to bring down a state, like in cold war

I think this is saying this is inevitable under self-governance, that people will end up organized into classes and fight each other

American Civil war a good example

Chinese Civil war another

Russian civil war too

although, neither state is presently a "heap of ashes" 


    8. Whether a State exhausts itself in its own convulsions, whether its internal discord brings it under the power of external foes - in any case it can be accounted irretrievable lost: IT IS IN OUR POWER. The despotism of Capital, which is entirely in our hands, reaches out to it a straw that the State, willy-nilly, must take hold of: if not - it goes to the bottom.


alluding to using internal conflicts to grab power

the pattern of "turned over to self government" then "from that moment on we get internecine stife" which "develops into battles between classes" until "IN OUR POWER" played out from WWI through cold war

In Russian and Germany after WWI, got new self government (February Revolution, German revolution after Keil Mutiny), followed by class warfare, followed by installation of a dictatorship (I guess initial attempt in Germany failed and took longer).

I think something similar played out in India too--finally got free of British rule, things are looking bright and are hopeful of demoracy, only to become Soviet client state.

China's revolution against Monarchical rule almost took a turn toward democracy, but Sun Jiaoren assassinated, and instead get civil war and dictatorship.

reminds me of this:


https://archive.org/stream/YuriBezmenovBlackIsBeautifulCommunismIsNot/YuriBezmenovBlackIsBeautiful_djvu.txt
	...Discontented people produce less. Low- er productivity creates economic instabil- ity and social unrest. This leads to radical- ism because people become impatient. That leads to power struggles. Power struggles lead to replacement of social, political structure. That replacement is the fastest way to internal upheaval, civil war, or invasion. The result for the last observ- able 35 years is always the same — closed society. Just the opposite of what we started with. Everything is nationalized, from banks to washrooms. Human beings belong to the state.



http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	9. Should anyone of a liberal mind say that such reflections as the above are immoral, I would put the following questions: If every State has two foes and if in regard to the external foe it is allowed and not considered immoral to use every manner and art of conflict, as for example to keep the enemy in ignorance of plans of attack and defense, to attack him by night or in superior numbers, then in what way can the same means in regard to a worse foe, the destroyer of the structure of society and the commonweal, be called immoral and not permissible?


I think this is saying that states use subversion and trickery in war against each other, so it's ok if organizations do it too. I guess this is using moral relativism.

problem with that logic is what they do is not ok or "permissible," whoever is doing it


	10. Is it possible for any sound logical mind to hope with any success to guide crowds by the aid of reasonable counsels and arguments, when any objection or contradiction, senseless though it may be, can be made and when such objection may find more favor with the people, whose powers of reasoning are superficial? Men in masses and the men of the masses, being guided solely by petty passions, paltry beliefs, traditions and sentimental theorems, fall a prey to party dissension, which hinders any kind of agreement even on the basis of a perfectly reasonable argument. Every resolution of a crowd depends upon a chance or packed majority, which, in its ignorance of political secrets, puts forth some ridiculous resolution that lays in the administration a seed of anarchy.


reminds me of this:


https://archive.org/stream/BezmenovLoveLetterToAmerica/YuriBezmenov-LoveLetterToAmerica_djvu.txt
	America is obviously a "stronger force" that Communism is unable to defeat. But it is possible to conquer this nation using the preconditions 1 have described, created by Americans themselves, and diverting America's attention away from these mortally dangerous preconditions. The situation is similar to a house, the owners of which have stored explosives and inflammable materials INSIDE. To destroy this house the enemy does not have to intrude physically into it. It is enough to start a fire next door and wait till the wind blows in the right direction. Meanwhile the enemy may "throw in some great ideas" for the owners to argue about in order to take their attention off the actual fire: environmental protection, gay liberation or emancipation of house pets are the types of non-critical arguments that divert America's attention from the real danger. Smart people would notice the fire and remove the inflammable objects and materials BEFORE the house catches the fire. Useful idiots will keep arguing about whether it is constitutional or not to pay firefighters, or the equality of husband and wife in domestic chores (who should remove the combustibles), until the actual explosion blows their enfeebled brains all over the neighbourhood. 


I think 10. saying that its hopeless to guide people with reason since its so easy to get them to squabble over trivialities. Saying people in groups are guided more by traditions and petty thinking than reason. "Falling prey to party dissention" what Madison tried to solve in Federalist 10 and Washington warned about in farewell address. Protocols author is saying "spirit of faction" (as Washington put it) "hinders any kind of agreement even on the basis of a perfectly reasonable argument," which seems to be largely true for many people.

I guess this is basically arguing people are too dumb to be lead by reason since they too easily fall for partisan motivated reasoning and divide and conquer tactics.

A lot of this based on truth--partisan motivated reasoning well researched and amazingly strong. Getting people to argue about stupid trivial things while the house is burning down is easy (e.g. #BlackLivesMatter vs. #AllLivesMatter during 2016 election). I guess problem is they take this as an axiom and don't even bother trying to lead people by reason, they just try to make partisan-motivated reasoning worse.

Are there any good examples of people overcoming partisan motivated reasoning after 2016 election? The election was mostly an affirmation of protocols 10

I guess election could be a sort of pep-rally for them, "prove" that they were right. It's also annoying--you'd have to be stupid to think that just because people are suspectiple to this trick means that you should use it constantly and give up on everything else.

I guess I'm not really sure what they believe--is the logic rooted in cynicism? People become more reasonable when they learn and practice reason, even an idiot can understand that, right? 


	11. The political has nothing in common with the moral. The ruler who is governed by the moral is not a skilled politician, and is therefore unstable on his throne. He who wishes to rule must have recourse both to cunning and to make-believe. Great national qualities, like frankness and honesty, are vices in politics, for they bring down rulers from their thrones more effectively and more certainly than the most powerful enemy. Such qualities must be the attributes of the kingdoms of the GOYIM, but we must in no wise be guided by them.


the philsophy of Machiavelli, Kissinger, a bunch of others, an idea that pops up a lot. This idea can also be found in Lenin's writings on "communist ethics." (https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1920/oct/02.htm)

appeals to sociopaths, I guess gets them to believe their not evil, just "smart"

there are a lot of examples of politicians claiming success, at least temporarily, under this mindset

and just as many crash and burn

what can be said? if everyone operated this way we'd all be dead

if you have to lie to get ahead you're doing something wrong

also interesting: if every politician operated this way, they'd all have secrets that could be exploited...

I think I've heard before some saying this idea "liberated" them from the "tyranny" of morality. But, maybe not so liberating after all.


	MIGHT IS RIGHT    

	12. Our right lies in force. The word "right" is an abstract thought and proved by nothing. The word means no more than: Give me what I want in order that thereby I may have a proof that I am stronger than you.    

	13. Where does right begin? Where does it end?    

	14. In any State in which there is a bad organization of authority, an impersonality of laws and of the rulers who have lost their personality amid the flood of rights ever multiplying out of liberalism, I find a new right - to attack by the right of the strong, and to scatter to the winds all existing forces of order and regulation, to reconstruct all institutions and to become the sovereign lord of those who have left to us the rights of their power by laying them down voluntarily in their liberalism.


is this talking about "right" as an "ethical" or "right" as in "civil rights?"

I guess they believe its their right to mess up countries and seize power

the concept of rights and respecting them is for the purpose of stopping people from seizing power and lording over others--what they're saying doesn't make sense.

like if you look at how the concept of civil rights developed, Magna Carta, American revolution, it was basically:

- some tyrant is abusing his power and fucking everything up

- this sucks

- we decide we have these rights, and we are all going to respect them so it doesn't happen again

it's a very practical thing


	15. Our power in the present tottering condition of all forms of power will be more invincible than any other, because it will remain invisible until the moment when it has gained such strength that no cunning can any longer undermine it.


laying out a plan to secretly take over the world

maybe it didn't work--by now they are so heavily infiltrated by counter-despots (or whatever you'd call them) that they can't do anything right

communist revolutions after WWI didn't work, world communism during cold war didn't work, by now they are grasping at straws trying to find excuses for nations to fight...


	16. Out of the temporary evil we are now compelled to commit will emerge the good of an unshakable rule, which will restore the regular course of the machinery of the national life, brought to naught by liberalism. The result justifies the means. Let us, however, in our plans, direct our attention not so much to what is good and moral as to what is necessary and useful.


"for us it is a matter of expediency"  

they say "temporary evil"--do they expect something good to come out of it once they take over the world? Apparently they're still in the "temporary evil" stage for the past 100 years


	17. Before us is a plan in which is laid down strategically the line from which we cannot deviate without running the risk of seeing the labor of many centuries brought to naught.


I think this says something about the purpose of the document, maybe has different meanings to different people.


	18. In order to elaborate satisfactory forms of action it is necessary to have regard to the rascality, the slackness, the instability of the mob, its lack of capacity to understand and respect the conditions of its own life, or its own welfare. It must be understood that the might of a mob is blind, senseless and unreasoning force ever at the mercy of a suggestion from any side. The blind cannot lead the blind without bringing them into the abyss; consequently, members of the mob, upstarts from the people even though they should be as a genius for wisdom, yet having no understanding of the political,cannot come forward as leaders of the mob without bringing the whole nation to ruin.    

	19. Only one trained from childhood for independent rule can have understanding of the words that can be made up of the political alphabet.    


an appeal to narcissism and elitism, probably vices they'd have to stoke in anyone they'd hope to rope into this plot


	20. A people left to itself, i.e., to upstarts from its midst, brings itself to ruin by party dissensions excited by the pursuit of power and honors and the disorders arising therefrom. Is it possible for the masses of the people calmly and without petty jealousies to form judgment, to deal with the affairs of the country, which cannot be mixed up with personal interest? Can they defend themselves from an external foe? It is unthinkable; for a plan broken up into as many parts as there are heads in the mob, loses all homogeneity, and thereby becomes unintelligible and impossible of execution.


this is why Republican government was invented, even cites same reasons in Federalist 10. What are they trying to say here?


	WE ARE DESPOTS


at least they're honest


    21. It is only with a despotic ruler that plans can be elaborated extensively and clearly in such a way as to distribute the whole properly among the several parts of the machinery of the State: from this the conclusion is inevitable that a satisfactory form of government for any country is one that concentrates in the hands of one responsible person. Without an absolute despotism there can be no existence for civilization which is carried on not by the masses but by their guide, whosoever that person may be. The mob is savage, and displays its savagery at every opportunity. The moment the mob seizes freedom in its hands it quickly turns to anarchy, which in itself is the highest degree of savagery.


I think author is arguing that the more government is in the hands of the people, the more they fight among themselves over who gets more and the less efficiently resources are allocated in the State.

I can see how this document lead to conspiracy theories about "Jewish Bolshevism"

problem with this view, as history shows, is that when despots get control of a state, resources don't go to where they're needed, they go to the despot

one of main points of government for the people is to prevent situations where a tyrant gorges himself while the state rots

do any of them believe this anymore? I guess its easy for some people to believe "everything would be perfect if I were just dictator for life..." it even says that at the top


	22. Behold the alcoholic animals, bemused with drink, the right to an immoderate use of which comes along with freedom. It is not for us and ours to walk that road. The peoples of the GOYIM are bemused with alcoholic liquors; their youth has grown stupid on classicism and from early immorality, into which it has been inducted by our special agents - by tutors, lackeys, governesses in the houses of the wealthy, by clerks and others, by our women in the places of dissipation frequented by the GOYIM. In the number of these last I count also the so-called "society ladies," voluntary followers of the others in corruption and luxury.


this is interesting, describing an operation of provocateurs besetting people with vices

Rachkovsky, alleged author of protocols (or one who ordered it) would know a thing or two about using people by tricking them into doing something they shouldn't:


http://articles.latimes.com/2010/aug/01/entertainment/la-ca-alex-butterworth-20100801
    Rachkovsky followed his prey abroad; as head of the Paris branch of the Okhrana, he planted agents among the émigrés who goaded angry, naïve young people into what the author describes as "heinous crimes of which they might never have otherwise conceived."


author shows contempt for the wealthy, probably easy to develop that attitude in 19th-century Europe

the idea of "the corrupt elite living in luxury are getting their up-commence" shows up in Lenin's writings


I assume "us" means their organization, "GOYIM" means everybody else


    23. Our countersign is - Force and Make-believe. Only force conquers in political affairs, especially if it be concealed in the talents essential to statesmen.


I think they're talking about conquering by "soft power"


    Violence must be the principle, and cunning and make-believe the rule for governments which do not want to lay down their crowns at the feet of agents of some new power. This evil is the one and only means to attain the end, the good. Therefore we must not stop at bribery, deceit and treachery when they should serve towards the attainment of our end. In politics one must know how to seize the property of others without hesitation if by it we secure submission and sovereignty.


"bribery, deceit and treachery" was what the Okhrana was already good at at the time of writing

I guess they wanted to take it world-wide, or even more world-wide than there were already


	24. Our State, marching along the path of peaceful conquest, has the right to replace the horrors of war by less noticeable and more satisfactory sentences of death, necessary to maintain the terror which tends to produce blind submission. Just but merciless severity is the greatest factor of strength in the State: not only for the sake of gain but also in the name of duty, for the sake of victory, we must keep to the programme of violence and make-believe. The doctrine of squaring accounts is precisely as strong as the means of which it makes use. Therefore it is not so much by the means themselves as by the doctrine of severity that we shall triumph and bring all governments into subjection to our super-government. It is enough for them to know that we are too merciless for all disobedience to cease.


The Okhrana would have known a thing or two about terrorizing statesmen into submission by threat of assassination. not sure how it's "just" or "replacing the horrors of war"

It sounds like they wanted to develop a reputation of severely punishing those who disobey them, so the rest would fall in line.

The Okhrana was pretty powerful already at time of writing, basically took over French government by then, had a lot of agents in press, criminal organizations, revolutionary organizations around the world. I guess the idea of a "super-government" wouldn't seem so far-fetched to them.


	WE SHALL END LIBERTY


It gets better!

only on page 7, I'll finish this later...


------


http://www.notbored.org/dialogue-in-hell.html

looks like this is their philosophy?

this is the book protocols steals lines from

close to philosophy in protocols but worded better

also has laying out plans of "soft power" conquest a la bolsheviks


------


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	WE SHALL END LIBERTY

	25. Far back in ancient times we were the first to cry among the masses of the people the words"Liberty, Equality, Fraternity," words many times repeated since these days by stupid poll- parrots who, from all sides around, flew down upon these baits and with them carried away the well-being of the world, true freedom of the individual, formerly so well guarded against the pressure of the mob. 


a reference to the French revolution? Machiavelli's character in "Dialogue in Hell" uses the French Revolution to argue the people rising up to secure liberty for themselves is folly (or something like that)


	The would-be wise men of the GOYIM, the intellectuals, could not make anything out of the uttered words in their abstractedness; did not see that in nature there is no equality, cannot be freedom: that Nature herself has established inequality of minds, of characters, and capacities, just as immutably as she has established subordination to her laws: never stopped to think that the mob is a blind thing, that upstarts elected from among it to bear rule are, in regard to the political, the same blind men as the mob itself,


wait so where do these guys think they are from then? Mars?

I can think of some counterexamples to this...


	that the adept, though he be a fool, can yet rule, whereas the non-adept, even if he were a genius, understands nothing in the political - to all those things the GOYIM paid no regard;


reminds me of this:

http://www.ifstone.org/weekly/IFStonesWeekly-1957oct14.pdf
	October 14, 1957

	A Terrifying Stranger Knocks at Heaven's Gate

	...A Heterogeneous Horde

	...A gleaming metal ball hurtling regularly around our planet may be the first signal of intelligent life on earth to observers elsewhere who could not see into the murky depths of our aerial ocean. They might be surprised to learn that the minds which have made such wonders possible nowhere rule the human societies of which they are a part. Whatever the ostensible form of the society, everywhere the cunning gov- ern. Here the ruler may be a Tammany-style politician, there a Commissar. The finer minds everywhere are subordinate to the inferior.

	...The two contenders for mastery of the earth, the "commu- nistic" Russians and the "capitalistic" Americans have this in common. Their rulers equally distrust the "intellectual." The intellectual, like a special breed in a hive, is well fed so long as he devotes himself to the tasks allotted to him by his masters: the fabrication of new weapons, the inculcation of ideas to keep the human herd submissive. But let him begin to speak his mind, and he gets into trouble. At the least he may find himself deprived of livelihood; at the worst, he may be imprisoned as "subversive" or "counter-revolutionary." The intellectual on both sides is prized and yet suspect, favored but subjected.


both protocols author and Stone agree the "adept" rule the "geniuses," but Stone says this is something wrong with our species


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	...yet all the time it was based upon these things that dynastic rule rested: the father passed on to the son a knowledge of the course of political affairs in such wise that none should know it but members of the dynasty and none could betray it to the governed. As time went on, the meaning of the dynastic transference of the true position of affairs in the political was lost, and this aided the success of our cause.


I think Machiavelli said something like this?

they're really big on elitism and secret knowledge


    26. In all corners of the earth the words "Liberty, Equality, Fraternity," brought to our ranks, thanks to our blind agents, whole legions who bore our banners with enthusiasm.


implying they were involved in French Revolution? Napoleon Wars?


    And all the time these words were canker-worms at work boring into the well-being of the GOYIM, putting an end everywhere to peace, quiet, solidarity and destroying all the foundations of the GOYA States. As you will see later, this helped us to our triumph: it gave us the possibility, among other things, of getting into our hands the master card - the destruction of the privileges, or in other words of the very existence of the aristocracy of the GOYIM, that class which was the only defense peoples and countries had against us.


maybe this idea behind why Bolsheviks so vehemently attacked the bourgeois? In those societies, the aristocracy would be the only ones well-connected enough to spot and counter them. The Bolsheviks would figure the rest (the "proletariat") were just unruly mobs they could control. So they turned the proletariat on the bourgeois.


    On the ruins of the eternal and genealogical aristocracy of the GOYIM we have set up the aristocracy of our educated class headed by the aristocracy of money. The qualifications for this aristocracy we have established in wealth, which is dependent upon us, and in knowledge, for which our learned elders provide the motive force.


...and replaced it with their own aristocracy


    27. Our triumph has been rendered easier by the fact that in our relations with the men, whom we wanted, we have always worked upon the most sensitive chords of the human mind, upon the cash account, upon the cupidity, upon the insatiability for material needs of man; and each one of these human weaknesses, taken alone, is sufficient to paralyze initiative, for it hands over the will of men to the disposition of him who has bought their activities.


reminds me of:

https://www.muckrock.com/news/archives/2017/jul/21/fbi-soviet-recruitment/
	The pamphlet also lists several motives and techniques Russian and other Soviet operatives would use in their attempts to recruit someone: greed, blackmail, national pride, exploitation of emotions, “false flags”, ideology, naivete, and revenge



http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	28. The abstraction of freedom has enabled us to persuade the mob in all countries that their government is nothing but the steward of the people who are the owners of the country, and that the steward may be replaced like a worn-out glove.

	29. It is this possibility of replacing the representatives of the people which has placed at our disposal, and, as it were, given us the power of appointment.


says they like democracies better than monarchies

I can believe it

they got faking democracy, rigging elections through press down to a science: https://www.foreignaffairs.com/reviews/capsule-review/2005-11-01/virtual-politics-faking-democracy-post-soviet-world


but with some monarchs they've had trouble, like King Hussein. Even Tsar Nicholas gave them a hard time almost deciding not to mobilize his forces.

really depends on the monarch



------

http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	Protocol No. 2

    1. It is indispensable for our purpose that wars, so far as possible, should not result in territorial gains: war will thus be brought on to the economic ground, where the nations will not fail to perceive in the assistance we give the strength of our predominance, and this state of things will put both sides at the mercy of our international AGENTUR; which possesses millions of eyes ever on the watch and unhampered by any limitations whatsoever. Our international rights will then wipe out national rights, in the proper sense of right, and will rule the nations precisely as the civil law of States rules the relations of their subjects among themselves.


not completely sure what this is saying

I guess that they will keep nations fighting wars while their "international AGENTUR" with "millions of eyes" will be exploiting this and grabbing power


    2. The administrators, whom we shall choose from among the public, with strict regard to their capacities for servile obedience, will not be persons trained in the arts of government, and will therefore easily become pawns in our game in the hands of men of learning and genius who will betheir advisers, specialists bred and reared from early childhood to rule the affairs of the whole world.


"pawns in our game"... like Trump!

"specialists bred and reared from early childhood" -- maybe Hope Hicks an example? iirc from he childhood she was sort-of groomed for "leadership"

other examples: Al Gore (https://pastebin.com/r5PHGSnz), probably any European Monarch around WW1...


    As is well known to you, these specialists of ours have been drawing to fit them for rule the information they need from our political plans from the lessons of history, from observations made of the events of every moment as it passes. The GOYIM are not guided by practical use of unprejudiced historical observation, but by theoretical routine without any critical regard for consequent results.


basically sums up the "dialouge" that this doc draws from (http://www.notbored.org/dialogue-in-hell.html
)

the whole thing is basically setting up Montesquieu to be the "foolhardy/wide-eyed idealist" while Machiavelli comes in with his dose of "realism" saying Montesquieu's separation of powers ideas don't work (with historical examples), kindof comes off too strong

I guess they believe their secret (and so necessarily not very well tested) theories of how history works are better than everyone else's


    We need not, therefore, take any account of them - let them amuse themselves until the hour strikes, or live on hopes of new forms of enterprising pastime, or on the memories of all they have enjoyed. For them let that play the principal part which we have persuaded them to accept as the dictates of science (theory). It is with this object in view that we are constantly, by means of our press, arousing a blind confidence in these theories. The intellectuals of the GOYIM will puff themselves up with their knowledge and without any logical verification of them will put into effect all the information available from science, which our AGENTUR specialists have cunningly pieced together for the purpose of educating their minds in the direction we want.


come off pretty confident in their control of the press and over world's ideas

saying they can get masses to believe in wrong ideas about sociology, history for their benefit

examples?

I guess the idea of "free and independent press" and spinning it as it only matters if its free from the government that country of the press is in--what about freedom from organizations not tied to any government? or foreign governements?

another is blind faith in separation of powers--what if people across powers scheme to collude? (I guess Dialouge in hell big on this one, and derisive of Montesquieu and his faith in seperation of powers too)


Kissinger's ideas on states always machiavellianly follow their own interests a good example (got spread everywhere and would help operations described above)


this is a good example:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Politics_of_Nonviolent_Action
	Chapter 1, The Nature and Control of Political Power, explains that, although rarely articulated, there are "basically... two views of the nature of power."[1]:8 The "monolith theory"[1]:9 views people as dependent upon the good will of their governments, whereas nonviolent action is grounded in the converse "pluralistic-dependency theory"[1]:9 that views government as "dependent on the people's good will, decisions and support,"[1]:8 a view that Sharp argues is "sounder and more accurate."[1]:8 Sharp argues that "political power is not intrinsic to the power-holder,"[1]:11 but flows from outside sources that include perceptions of authority, available human resources; skills and knowledge; material resources; and intangible psychological and ideological factors. These sources all depend upon obedience, which arises for "various and multiple"[1]:19 reasons that include habit, fear of sanctions, perceived moral obligation, psychological identification with the ruler, zones of indifference, and absence of self-confidence among subjects. Obedience is essentially voluntary, and consent can be withdrawn.


obviously false

example: the left will as a rule always defy whatever Donald Trump says, often with boisterous protests. This gives a lot of power to those who can influence him. Is this power based on obedience? 


	Part Two: The Methods of Nonviolent Action

	Volume 2 (chapters 3 to 8) contains a detailed listing and description of specific methods of nonviolent action, such as boycotts, strikes, and sit-ins. Such a listing, Sharp says, "may assist actionists in the selection of methods most appropriate for use in a particular situation... [or] give researchers and persons evaluating the political potentialities of the nonviolent technique a greater grasp of its armory of methods of struggle."[23]:114 Nearly 200 methods are listed in the table of contents, and Sharp groups them into three broad categories, protest and persuasion (ch. 3), noncooperation (chs. 4-7), and intervention (ch. 8), in terms of how they relate to the dynamics of nonviolent action (Vol. 3). These categories "ought not to be regarded as rigid, but simply as generally valid."[23]:114 The methods are summarized in the adjacent table.


And what if the "organizers" of your nonviolent struggle work for the government you're trying to replace?



	...Reviews have appeared in the Armed Forces & Society,[3] International Organization,[4] Social Forces,[5] Social Work,[6] The Annals of the American Academy of Political and Social Science,[7] Ethics,[8] American Journal of Sociology,[9] The Journal of Developing Areas,[10] The Western Political Quarterly,[11] Political Theory,[12] The Bay State Banner,[13] and elsewhere.[15]

	In Armed Forces & Society, Kenneth Boulding described the book as "monumental,"[3]:140 writing that "there are some works which bear the unmistakable stamp of the classic.... and this work is a good candidate."[3]:140 Sharp, he said, "has been called the "Machiavelli of nonviolence" and the "Clausewitz of nonviolent warfare" [and] the comparisons are by no means unjust."[3]:140 The book "reveals a large but previously mostly unnoticed segment of human action relationship which would very properly be described as 'nonviolent warfare.'"[3]:140–1


I think read somewhere book author gave lectures all over U.S. military academies

Sharp's theories can easily be repudiated by studying the 1917 Bolshevik revolution, or even the 2016 U.S. election.

I guess they are right about importance of studying history... (probably why they make it so damn hard)



http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	DESTRUCTIVE EDUCATION

	3. Do not suppose for a moment that these statements are empty words: think carefully of the successes we arranged for Darwinism, Marxism, Nietzsche-ism. To us Jews, at any rate, it should be plain to see what a disintegrating importance these directives have had upon the minds of the GOYIM.


"to us [maniacical narcassistic sociopaths], at any rate, it should be plain to see what a disintegrating importance these directives have had upon the minds of [everybody else]"

I guess they claim Darwinism, Marxism, and Nietzche-ism as their influence operations projects

other things they could probably claim:

- anarchism (got spread around by Okhrana agents, Rachkovsky himself used to convince Russian emigre bombthrowers to stir shit in France and give French government an excuse to let Okhrana set up shop there)

- realpolitik ("I think the KGB's got their arm on Kissinger...")

- all the shit that comes out of Julias Evola's mouth

- Nazism (see Kellog book http://bookfi.net/dl/548070/5d8658)

- "climate denialism" (and they probably named it to piss off climate skeptics too)

- Islamic fundamentalism a la ISIS (based in part on protocols of zion, interestingly)

- Rand's Objectivism

- Leninism

- McCarthyism

- "Alt Right"

- Political Correctness (particularly the "safe space" variety)

- whatever philosophy this doc has (Machiavelism on steroids?)


probably a lot I think


	4. It is indispensable for us to take account of the thoughts, characters, tendencies of the nations in order to avoid making slips in the political and in the direction of administrative affairs. The triumphof our system of which the component parts of the machinery may be variously disposed according to the temperament of the peoples met on our way, will fail of success if the practical application of it be not based upon a summing up of the lessons of the past in the light of the present. 


kindof like Bezmenov's ideas on "ideological subversion:"


http://uselessdissident.blogspot.com/2008/11/interview-with-yuri-bezmenov-part-three.html
	...Most of the activity of the department was to compile [a] huge amount (volume) of information on individuals who were instrumental in creating public opinion: publishers, editors, journalists, actors, educationalists, professors of political science, members of parliament, [and] representatives of business circles. Most of these people were divided roughly [into] two groups. Those who would toe the Soviet foreign policy, they would be promoted to the positions of power through media and public opinion manipulation. Those who refused the Soviet influence in their own country would be character-assassinated or executed physically, con-revolution. 

	...Bezmenov: Ideological subversion is the process, which is legitimate, overt, and open; you can see it with your own eyes. All you have to do, all American mass media has to do, is to unplug their bananas from their ears, open up their eyes, and they can see it. There is no mystery. [It has] nothing to do with espionage. I know that espionage intelligence-gathering looks more romantic. It sells more deodorants through the advertising, probably. That’s why your Hollywood producers are so crazy about James Bond-type of thrillers.

	But in reality, the main emphasis of the KGB is not in the area of intelligence at all. According to my opinion and [the] opinion of many defectors of my caliber, only about 15% of time, money, and manpower [are] spent on espionage as such. The other 85% is a slow process, which we call either ‘ideological subversion,’ or ‘active measures’—‘[?]’ in the language of the KGB—or ‘psychological warfare.’ What it basically means is, to change the perception of reality, of every American, to such an extent that despite of the abundance of information, no one is able to come to sensible conclusions in the interests of defending themselves, their families, their community and their country.


or other descriptions of active measures (I think... do defectors or researches other than Bezmenov talk about Soviet efforst to change people's ideologies?)


	5. In the hands of the States of to-day there is a great force that creates the movement of thought in the people, and that is the Press. The part played by the Press is to keep pointing our requirements supposed to be indispensable, to give voice to the complaints of the people, to express and to create discontent. It is in the Press that the triumph of freedom of speech finds its incarnation. But the GOYIM States have not known how to make use of this force; and it has fallen into our hands. Through the Press we have gained the power to influence while remaining ourselves in the shade; thanks to the Press we have got the GOLD in our hands, notwithstanding that we have had to gather it out of the oceans of blood and tears. But it has paid us, though we have sacrificed many of our people.


Rachkovsky might have felt this way:


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/books-and-monographs/okhrana-the-paris-operations-of-the-russian-imperial-police/5474-1.html
	Harting's case officer was Pyotr Rachkovsky, probably the ablest head of the Okhrana's Foreign Bureau. Rachkovsky was a pioneer. He refined the art of what we today call active measures or perceptions management techniques. He paid subsidies to journalists willing to write articles favorable to Russian interests, and he purchased or subsidized such periodicals as Revue Russe and Le Courier Franco-Russe. During his tenure (1884-1902), journalists on the Okhrana payroll began planting articles in the French press that were favorable to Russian interests. Rachkovsky also created the Ligue pour le Salut de la Patrie Russe, which promoted positive views toward Russia among French citizens; this group was a forerunner of Soviet front organizations and "friendship societies."


https://www.gwern.net/docs/terrorism/1989-andrew.pdf
    Like much else in the study of contemporary intelligence, KGB and GRU foreign operations are commonly interpreted with almost total disregard for historical perspective. "Active measures" are widely believed to be an invention of Soviet intelligence. In reality, though the KGB has been responsible for an enormous expansion in the use made of them, their effectiveness was at least as great in tsarist times. There is no convincing evidence that any KGB-inspired press campaign in the West as been as effective as the tsarist attempting to persuade Western investors, all of whom later lost their money, to ignore the risks of investing in Russia. Before World War I, every Paris newspaper of note save for the socialist L'Humanite was successfully bribed to support tsarist government loans. By 1914, 25 percent of France's foreign investment was in Russia


http://uselessdissident.blogspot.com/2008/11/interview-with-yuri-bezmenov-part-three.html
    Each victim on our side is worth in the sight of God a thousand GOYIM.


1000, really? why not 999? 5? make it 666 to keep with the theme

but if they really say so...


	The total number of military and civilian casualties in World War I was more than 41 million: there were over 18 million deaths and 23 million wounded, ranking it among the deadliest conflicts in human history.

	...World War II was the deadliest military conflict in history in absolute terms of total casualties. Over 60 million people were killed, which was about 3% of the 1940 world population (est. ... World War II fatality statistics vary, with estimates of total deaths ranging from 50 million to more than 80 million.

	...But the Nazis targeted many other groups: for their race, beliefs or what they did. Historians estimate the total number of deaths to be 11 million, with the victims encompassing gay people, priests, gypsies, people with mental or physical disabilities, communists, trade unionists, Jehovah's Witnesses, ...

	...The world's costliest civil war, in terms of the number of lives lost during combat and in events relating to the war, is the Russian Civil War of 1917-22. It is estimated that the former Soviet Union lost some 1.5 million combatants, and around 8 million civilians died following armed attacks, famine and disease.

	...While statistics vary, it has been suggested that up to 2.5 million people died during the 1945-1949 phase of the Civil War. Several historians suggest the death toll for the entire Chinese Civil War period (1927-49) exceeded six million.

	...Chinese casualties. ... The Chinese casualties were 3.22 million soldiers. 9.13 million civilians who died in the crossfire, and another 8.4 million as non-military casualties.Aug 26, 2015
	Second Sino-Japanese War - New World Encyclopedia

	...Chinese journalist Yang Jisheng concluded there were 36 million deaths due to starvation, while another 40 million others failed to be born, so that "China's total population loss during the Great Famine then comes to 76 million."


18 million + 60 million + 11 million + 9.5 million + 2.5 million + 3.22 million + 9.13 million + 8.4 million + 36 million = 158 million

divided by 1,000 = 158,000

so to keep score we'd have to kill 158,000 of them (under a conservative estimate)

------


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	PROTOCOL No. 3

	1. To-day I may tell you that our goal is now only a few steps off. There remains a small space to cross and the whole long path we have trodden is ready now to close its cycle of the Symbolic Snake, by which we symbolize our people. When this ring closes, all the States of Europe will be locked in its coil as in a powerful vice.


gunning for Europe


	2. The constitution scales of these days will shortly break down, for we have established them with a certain lack of accurate balance in order that they may oscillate incessantly until they wear through the pivot on which they turn. The GOYIM are under the impression that they have welded them sufficiently strong and they have all along kept on expecting that the scales would come into equilibrium. But the pivots - the kings on their thrones - are hemmed in by their representatives, who play the fool, distraught with their own uncontrolled and irresponsible power. This power they owe to the terror which has been breathed into the palaces. As they have no means of getting at their people,into their very midst, the kings on their thrones are no longer able to come to terms with them and so strengthen themselves against seekers after power. We have made a gulf between the far-seeing Sovereign Power and the blind force of the people so that both have lost all meaning, for like the blindman and his stick, both are powerless apart.


have to guess what this means

"constitution scales" not "welded correctly"--saying governments of these states designed poorly?

they say they did something to put these "off balance" so that they oscillate and wear through the "pivot" which they say are kings on their thrones.

saying they are driving a wedge (I think) between Kings and their people

played out in WW1

	
	3. In order to incite seekers after power to a misuse of power we have set all forces in opposition one to another, breaking up their liberal tendencies towards independence. To this end we have stirred up every form of enterprise, we have armed all parties, we have set up authority as a target for every ambition. Of States we have made gladiatorial arenas where a lot of confused issues contend .... A little more, and disorders and bankruptcy will be universal ....


"incite seekers after power to a misuse of power"--2016 election an example. Clinton only cared about winning, and because of this she could be used for active measures. wikileaks show her campaign had a strategy of promoting "pied piper" candidates in RNC and so she ended up getting blamed for Trump's rise. She pulled a lot of schemes in Clinton Foundation, other areas of political career, and her campaign did the same in the DNC election. Apparently she thought this would help her get ahead, but it ended up being her ruin instead and she was used to get Trump elected and divide the U.S.

"set all forces in opposition one to another, breaking up their liberal tendencies"--this shows up over and over again; get two groups to fight each other, hate each other and out of desparation or expediency they'll do things to beat the other side that they never would have done otherwise. The fights among left and right in Congress is a good example--each side killed the fillibuster for nominees to beat the other, and this made the way the U.S. government works in that respect less bipartisan, "breaking up liberal tendancies."

That partisan fights between parties in a country or between countries suffocates the practice of classical liberalism is a general rule. E.g., the 4th ammendment in the U.S. bars warrentless searches and siezures, but during the bitterness of the cold war those in power in the U.S. came to respect it less. During the U.S. civil war, Lincoln suspeneded habeaus corpus out of expediency.

During WWI, Germany became a military dictatorship and grew to have less political freedom than even under the Kaiser; all this cited as necessary to win the war.

After the war, the bitterness of the fight between socialists and the right lead to Nazi Germany. Secret societies like Aufbau thought a Bolshevik "5th column" was eating away at their country and I guess saw the left and Jews as their popular base of support. Leaders who distrust so many of their countrymen tend towards authoritarianism.

It's like what Machiavelli's character said in "Dialouges out of hell"--states that fall prey to factions are reduced to anarchy or despotism.


"Of States we have made gladiatorial arenas where a lot of confused issues contend .... A little more, and disorders and bankruptcy will be universal ...."--goes back to Bezmenov's analogy of "whether it is constitutional or not to pay firefighters" while the house is burning down. Maybe an implementation of this can be seen in the mindset of political figures in the U.S. and other countries. They become cynical, see it as a game--whip up partisan anger over abortion rights or identity politics to "energize your base," focus on character assassinating your opponent instead of figuring out what's best for your countrymen and campaigning on that. All the while, "negative campaigning" tracks partisan polarization (https://pcl.stanford.edu/research/2012/iyengar-poq-affect-not-ideology.pdf).


    4. Babblers, inexhaustible, have turned into oratorical contests the sittings of Parliament and Administrative Boards. Bold journalists and unscrupulous pamphleteers daily fall upon executive officials. Abuses of power will put the final touch in preparing all institutions for their overthrow and everything will fly skyward under the blows of the maddened mob.


reminds me of Sun Tzu's ideas of "subversion" according to Bezmenov, and also the "Rules of Revolution":

http://uselessdissident.blogspot.com/2008/12/love-letter-to-america-part-two.html
	500 years before Christ, the Chinese military strategist Sun Tzu formulated the principle of subversion this way:

        1. Cover with ridicule all of the valid traditions in your opponent's country.
        2. Implicate their leaders in criminal affairs and turn them over to the scorn of their populace at the right time;
        3. Disrupt the work of their government by every means;
        4. Do not shun the aid of the lowest and most despicable individuals of your enemy's country.
        5. Spread disunity and dispute among the citizens.
        6. Turn the young against the old.
        7. Be generous with promises and rewards to collaborators and accomplices.

    Sound familiar? About 2500 years later we can read this very same instruction in a secret document, allegedly authored by the Communist International for their "young revolutionaries". The document is titled "Rules of Revolution":

        1. Corrupt the young, get them interested in sex, take them away from religion. Make them superficial and enfeebled.
        2. Divide the people into hostile groups by constantly harping on controversial issues of no importance.
        3. Destroy people's faith in their national leaders by holding the latter up for contempt, ridicule and disgrace.
        4. Always preach democracy, but seize power as fast and as ruthlessly as possible.
        5. By encouraging government extravagances, destroy its credit, produce years of inflation with rising prices and general discontent.
        6. Incite unnecessary strikes in vital industries, encourage civil disorders and foster a lenient and soft attitude on the part of the government towards such disorders.
        7. Cause breakdown of the old moral virtues: honesty, sobriety, self-restraint, faith in the pledged word. 

    I can not vouch for authenticity of this document, which, according to American conservative media was captured by the Allied forces alter WW II in defeated Germany, in Dusseldorf. But I can assure you, that these “rules” are almost a literal interpretation of those “theories and practices” which I learned from my KGB superiors and colleagues within the 'Novosti' Press Agency.


"journalists and pamphleteers" falling on "executive officials" played out a lot in WWI--most of the Bolshevik propaganda was just blaming officials for being imperialist and starting the war. And bolstering the narrative of this propaganda, abuses of power were revealed in certain documents, like the secret agreement for Sykes-Picot and von Jagow's memo on imperial conquest for Germany.

"Abuses of power will put the final touch in preparing all institutions for their overthrow and everything will fly skyward under the blows of the maddened mob."--the Keil mutiny a good example of this. German admirality decided to send Navy on a suicide mission while Germany was losing the war, and the resulting mutiny sparked the German Revolution. Kerensky's needless offensive brought simmering discontent already spread by Bolshevik propaganda in the army and citizens to a boil at just the right time, and paved the way for the Bolshevik revolution.


------

	POVERTY OUR WEAPON

	5. All people are chained down to heavy toil by poverty more firmly than ever. They were chained by slavery and serfdom; from these, one way and another, they might free themselves. These could be settled with, but from want they will never get away. We have included in the constitution such rights as to the masses appear fictitious and not actual rights. All these so-called "Peoples Rights" can exist only in idea, an idea which can never be realized in practical life. What is it to the proletariat laborer, bowed double over his heavy toil, crushed by his lot in life, if talkers get the right to babble, if journalists get the right to scribble any nonsense side by side with good stuff, once the proletariat has no other profit out of the constitution save only those pitiful crumbs which we fling them from our table in return for their voting in favor of what we dictate, in favor of the men we place in power, the servants of our AGENTUR ... Republican rights for a poor man are no more than a bitter piece of irony, for the necessity he is under of toiling almost all day gives him no present use of them, but the other hand robs him of all guarantee of regular and certain earnings by making him dependent on strikes by his comrades or lockouts by his masters.


I guess saying they wrote the constitutions of free states, and the rights they included benefit their press but not the poor.

how is poverty their "weapon?" I guess they are saying they can keep people wanting, and throw them "crumbs" to control them and get their people in power.


	WE SUPPORT COMMUNISM

	6. The people, under our guidance, have annihilated the aristocracy, who were their one and only defense and foster-mother for the sake of their own advantage which is inseparably bound up with the well-being of the people. Nowadays, with the destruction of the aristocracy, the people have fallen into the grips of merciless money-grinding scoundrels who have laid a pitiless and cruel yoke upon the necks of the workers.


say the aristocracy had to support the people by necessity--I guess this is generally true, even Machiavelli said it is always in the interests of tyrants to win the support of the people.

I guess the Bolsheviks figured they could get around this with propaganda and deception--as long as the people credit all their prosperity to you and blame all their problems on some enemy, you don't need to actually help the people to win their favor.

"the people have fallen into the grips of merciless money-grinding scoundrels"--referring to the industrial revolution? and after that all the barons and crony capitalists abusing their workers.

Pinkertons a good example? were brutal in beating down workers strikes, and also in touch with the Okhrana.

Factory work brought better wages but people were more miserable working in the factory than on the farm. On a farm you're probably working with your family and more or less self-directed (until they "idustrialized" that too I guess and brought in slavery). At a factory you're working 14 hour days, dull and repetative work where you're more or less a cog in a machine, people getting mangled, your boss doesn't care about you and just cares about the bottom line--a structure people take for granted today, but probably a shock for someone coming from agrarian living.

So the factory would be a target for exploiting discontent, especially as it was in the 19th and early 20th centuries. Lenin actually got criticized for focusing on industrial workers instead of them the agrarian peasentry--industrial workers were more wealthy, and were only a fraction of the population.

Upton Sinclair's "the Jungle" probably a good example of what they wanted to exploit to direct their "mobs."


	7. We appear on the scene as alleged saviours of the worker from this oppression when we propose to him to enter the ranks of our fighting forces - Socialists, Anarchists, Communists - to whom we always give support in accordance with an alleged brotherly rule (of the solidarity of all humanity) of our SOCIAL MASONRY.


by appearences at least, anarchism was a project of the Okhrana and they eventually switched to communism, using anarchism as a springboard (http://etheses.whiterose.ac.uk/9813/1/341813.pdf) 

A lot of Okhrana agents were professed anarchists or communists

Lenin, Rosa Luxemberg, others did this "appearing as saviours of the people" pretty plainly.


	The aristocracy, which enjoyed by law the labor of the workers, was interested in seeing that the workers were well fed, healthy, and strong. We are interested in just the opposite - in the diminution, the KILLING OUT OF THE GOYIM. Our power is in the chronic shortness of food and physical weakness of the worker because by all that this implies he is made the slave of our will, and he will not find in his own authorities either strength or energy to set against our will. Hunger creates the right of capital to rule the worker more surely than it was given to the aristocracy by the legal authority of kings.


plays out in great Chinese Famine (https://pastebin.com/BmvVSeNF) and Holodomor.

Maybe the source of this story, true or not (https://www.quora.com/Did-Stalin-pluck-a-live-chicken)

I guess they figure people weak, hungry and wanting are easier to control.


	8. By want and the envy and hatred which it engenders we shall move the mobs and with their hands we shall wipe out all those who hinder us on our way.


Denikin writes on effect of this on soldiers and officers in the army, soldiers ended up replacing and killing officers (I guess a type of "aristocracy") for them, with the motivations they prescribed:

https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	He said this, and with a gesture of despair went on his way. Matters were hopeless. Every time he tried to speak with them for a time, and in a friendly way, they would listen to him atten- tively; they liked to talk to him, and, on the whole, his Company looked on him favourably in their own way. But he felt that between him and them a wall had sprung up, against which all his good impulses were shattered. He had lost the path to their soul — lost it in the impassable jungle of darkness, roughness, and that wave of distrust and suspicion which had overwhelmed the soldiers. Was it, perhaps, that he used the wrong words, or was not able to say what he meant ? Scarcely that. But a little while before the War, when he was a student and was carried away by the popular movement, he had visited villages and factories and had found " real words " which were clear and comprehensible to all. But, most of all, with what words can one move men to face death when all their feelings are veiled by one feeling — that of self-preservation ? 

	..." Matters are bad, Petrovitch. They do not trust us." " God alone knows whom they trust; only last week the Sixth Company elected their Sergeant-Major themselves, and now they are making a mock of him; they won't let him say a word."

	" What will things be afterwards? "

	The Sergeant-Major blushed, and said softly :

	Then the Soloveytchicks will rule over us, and we shall be, so to speak, dumb animals before them — that is how matters will be, your honour." 

	..." Just so. They have elected the 2nd Lieutenant, my subaltern, as Company Commander, and degraded me as a supporter of the old regime, because, you see, I had drill twice a day — you know that the marching contingents come up here absolutely untrained. Indeed, the 2nd Lieutenant was the first to vote for my removal. ' We have been slave-driven long enough/ said he. ' Now we are free. We must clean out everyone, beginning with the head. A young man can manage the regiment just as well, so long as he is a true Democrat and supports the freedom of the soldier.' I would have left, but the Colonel flatly refused to allow it, and forbids me to hand over the company. So now, you see, we have two commanders. I have stood the situation lor five days. Look here, Albov, you are not in a hurry, are you ? Very good, then ; let us have a chat. I am feeling depressed. Albov, have you not yet thought of suicide? "

	" Not as yet."

	Bouravin rose to his feet.

	" Understand me, they have desecrated my soul, outraged my human dignity, and so every day, every hour, in every word, glance or gesture one sees a constant outrage. What have I done to them ? I have been in the service for eight years ; I have no family, no house or home. All this I have found in the regi- ment, my own regiment. Twice I have been badly wounded, and before my wounds were healed have rushed back to the regimen t — so there you are ! And I loved the soldier— I am ashamed to speak of it myself, but they must remember how, more than once, I have crept out under the barbed wire to drag in the wounded. And now ! Well, yes, I reverence the regimental flag and hate their crimson rags. I accept the Revolution. But to me Russia is infinitely dearer than the Revolution.


	...Everyone in the regiment knows already of that morning's event in Albov's Company. He is questioned about details. A Lieutenant-Colonel sitting next him wagged his head.

	" Well done, our old man. There was something in the Fifth Company, too. But I am afraid it will end badly. Have you heard what was done to the Commander of the Doubov Regi- ment, because he refused to confirm an elected Company Com- mander and put three agitators under arrest ? He was crucified. Yes, my boy ! They nailed him to a tree and began, in turn, to stick their bayonets into him, to cut off his ears, his nose, his fingers."

	He seized his head in his hands.

	" My God! Where do these men get so much brutality, so much baseness ? " 

	...	He spoke with deep sincerity and pain in his voice. There were moments when it seemed as if his words were breaking through the withered crust of those hardened hearts, as if a break would again take place in the attitude of the crowd. 

	" He, your ' new friend,' is calling you to mutiny, to violence, to robbery. Do you understand who will benefit when, in Russia, brother rises against brother, so as to turn to ashes, in sack and fire, the last property left not only to the ' capitalists,' but to the poverty-stricken workers and peasants ? No, it is not by violence, but by law and right, that you will acquire land and liberty and a tolerable existence. Your enemies are not here, among the officers, but there — beyond the barbed wire. And we shall not attain either to freedom or to peace by a dishonourable, cowardly standing in one and the same place, but in the general mighty rush of an advance/' 

	Was it that the impression of Sklianka's speech was still too vivid or that the regiment took offence at the word " cowardly " — for the most arrant coward will never forgive such a reminder — or, finally, was it the fault of the magic word " advance," which for some time past had ceased to be tolerated in the Army ? But anyhow Albov was not allowed to continue his speech. 

	The crowd bellowed, belched forth curses, pressed forward more and more, advancing toward the platform, and broke down the railing. An ominous roar, faces distorted with fury, and hands stretched forth towards the platform. The situation was becoming critical. 2nd Lieut. Yassny pushed his way through to Albov, took him by the arm, and forcibly led him to the exit. The soldiers of the First Company had already rushed up to it from all sides, and with their aid Albov, with great difficulty, made his way out of the crowd, amidst a shower of choice abuse. 


------


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
    9. WHEN THE HOUR STRIKES FOR OUR SOVEREIGN LORD OF ALL THE WORLD TO BECROWNED IT IS THESE SAME HANDS WHICH WILL SWEEP AWAY EVERYTHING THAT MIGHTBE A HINDRANCE THERETO.


I guess they were confident that could manipulate people into eliminating "hindrances" to their power grab

worked pretty well in Russian revolution--red terror eliminated most opposition, mobs of angry workers killed bourgiose, even burned the Okhrana's papers

didn't work with Black September

maybe Burtsev another good example of this not working--everyone liked him (how could you not like Russian communist revolutionary Sherlock Holmes uncovering vast government conspiracies?), and it comes off as reaching in their propaganda when they try to smear him. Try to make fun of him but he was cool as fuck


    10. The GOYIM have lost the habit of thinking unless prompted by the suggestions of our specialists. Therefore they do not see the urgent necessity of what we, when our kingdom comes, shall adopt at once, namely this, that IT IS ESSENTIAL TO TEACH IN NATIONAL SCHOOLS ONE SIMPLE, TRUE PIECE OF KNOWLEDGE, THE BASIS OF ALL KNOWLEDGE - THE KNOWLEDGE OF THE STRUCTURE OF HUMAN LIFE, OF SOCIAL EXISTENCE, WHICH REQUIRES DIVISION OF LABOR, AND, CONSEQUENTLY, THE DIVISION OF MEN INTO CLASSES AND CONDITIONS. It is essential for all to know that OWING TO DIFFERENCE IN THE OBJECTS OF HUMAN ACTIVITY THERE CANNOT BE ANY EQUALITY, that he, who by any act of his compromises a whole class, cannot be equally responsible before the law with him who affects no one but only his own honor. The true knowledge of the structure of society, into the secrets of which we do not admit the GOYIM, would demonstrate to all men that the positions and work must be kept within a certain circle, that they may not become a source of human suffering, arising from an education which does not correspond with the work which individuals are called upon to do. After a thorough study of this knowledge, the peoples will voluntarily submit to authority and accept such position as is appointed them in the State. In the present state of knowledge and the direction we have given to its development of the people, blindly believing things in print - cherishes - thanks to promptings intended to mislead and to its own ignorance - a blind hatred towards all conditions which it considers above itself, for it has no understanding of the meaning of class and condition.


says the mob (I guess that means people who aren't "adept" and politically savvy and machiavellian like them) don't understand the true structure of society but they do. I guess part of the "truth" they know and are generous enough to tell us is that people are not equal and that certain types of people are destined for certain types of labor.

I guess they're big on classes and elitism

sort-of like Machievelli--he wrote under assumption that there are two types of people, common "private" persons and "princes." He spoke with skepticism and a hint of derision of "private" persons trying to rise up to become "princes."

I guess they are saying they will explain this to people and they will accept rule by "princes."

They say they are responsible for people "blindly hating" classes above them, since they "blindly believe things in print."

Comes off as very down on the public at large, paint them as fools who can't think for themselves and suggest they think for them. This is a theme throughout entire doc.

This mindset would appeal to the people they were trying to recruit--sociopaths can't respect or even hate the people they manipulate, and apparently think of themselves as "superior beings:"



https://www.learning-mind.com/narcissistic-sociopath/
	Typically, a narcissistic sociopath will have a highly grandiose opinion of themselves and think that they are above any of society’s rules. They are not bound by normal regulations that apply to the rest of us, as they are superior beings.

	The narcissist in the sociopath will believe that they are better than everyone else. The sociopath in the narcissist, in turn, will have a total lack of regard for others and will tend to violate these rights with no compassion for their victims.

	One worrying consequence of a sociopath that has narcissist tendencies is that generally, sociopaths do not care if they are criticised by others, as they are not interested in the opinions of other people.

	The narcissistic sociopath, however, will react aggressively to negative criticism as the narcissist cannot tolerate any judgement on their behaviour.

	This, coupled with the callousness and lack of remorse from a sociopath, makes this combination particularly worrying.


https://www.quora.com/Do-psychopaths-think-themselves-as-superior-to-normal-people
	Do psychopaths think themselves as superior to normal people?

	...Moni Chan, Psychopath. Researcher by nature, extreme pragmatist.

	...While I consider myself superior to most people I meet intellectually and being capable of doing what I need and want, dominating the situations...

	...Jessica Cox, Highly functional Sociopath

	...Which in my case even if I didn't have any ‘proof’ just being me makes me Better than most people, socially skilled wise. Now, I'm very intelligent, more than the majority, athletic, and several other things that I'm not gonna list here because there isn't much time.

	The point is I know that I'm better than most ‘'normal people’ but I also know I'm better than most psychopaths/sociopaths, and people in general. And I'm very objective actually, like I'm not gonna say I'm smarter than Stephen hawking or Einstein.

	...Faba Liske, Undiagnosed psychopath and thinker.

	Yes, I do feeo superior. Not in general, but in some aspects.

	I'm more intelligent than most other people. I'm emotionally stable and rational and logical. I'm physically stronger and have a better stamina. I can get what I want.

	In these terms I consider myself to be superior, in others I don't.

	...Harlock Heughs, Friendly Neighborhood Psychopath

	To an extent yes. Now let get one thing straight I don't think I’m better than everyone else or that I’m a superior person. That has nothing to do with psychopathy, it’s entirely individual. But a superior version of a human being? Yeah.

	I look around and see people being so easily manipulated by media, trends, politics, lovers. People driven by emotion going on a murderous rampage, shooting up schools or blowing up a street in the name of religion. Constant illogical behavior, emotions ruling their lives, people crippled by anxiety, depression, PTSD etc.. none of this affects me, doesn't that sound superior to you? Psychopathy isn't a disorder, it’s an upgrade.


some hate people they see as suckers or weaker than them:


https://www.reddit.com/r/sociopath/comments/7dx1dq/is_it_possible_for_a_sociopath_to_look_down_on/
	Sociopaths tend to be very strong-willed, which I respect, I detest weak-willed people, those are generally my targets for destruction, if I see weakness I have an urge to hit it until the person breaks or covers the weak-spot. So natrually I respect people that shows no weakness, but it might be a case-by-case thing tbh. To summerize, I look down on weak people, and sociopaths are generally not weak.


	...Hell yeah. I look down on a lot of the people who post here. It's not that I disapprove of their actions, necessarily, but the way they live their lives. Some people seem to act without a sense of pride. Maybe it's because I have incredibly high standards with all aspects of life but I like to think of myself as the sort of person who will minimise unnecessary harm. Don't get me wrong, I can be pretty selfish and won't hesitate to put someone out to preserve my interests, but I quite simply give no fucks about people in general. Put it this way, if I see a few dudes breaking into a store / warehouse and stealing a bunch of shit, I'd laugh and call 'good luck!' or something. But if I saw those same dudes robbing from an elderly woman on their way home I'd very much disapprove.

	People are fucking retarded 90% of the time, so I just take the piss when I interact with them. I have violent urges and there are sooo many things I'd like to do in life, but the simple truth is I'm never going to be able to do them, because I'm too proud to let myself do them. Not worth the risk. So of course I look down upon those who just go around causing demonstrable harm to everyone, as it means they lack awareness and ability to control their lizard brains. Act in the shadows, or don't act at all.



https://www.psychologytoday.com/blog/extreme-fear/201010/how-psychopaths-choose-their-victims
	How Psychopaths Choose Their Victims

	Recently my journalistic career brought me in contact with a man who, when I first met him, seemed to be the very embodiment of a charming and well-heeled gentleman. He is a natural raconteur, good-looking, athletic, intellectually curious, financially successful, and wittily self-deprecating. What few people know about him is that he has left behind a trail of emotional destruction, having spent decades abusing vulnerable individuals for his own twisted purposes.

	Psychopaths, or sociopaths as some prefer to call them, are well known figures in our culture. We're fascinated by their predatory relationship with the rest of humanity. Their chilling alien-ness makes them convenient villains in books, film, and television. When we encounter them in real life, we think: There really are monsters roaming the world. But as my own recent experience has taught me, the crimes of the psychopath are not merely a function of the perpetrator. We are not all equally likely to fall prey. Just as psychopaths are a special breed, so too are their victims.

	...As it happened, some of the people in the videotapes really had been mugged -- and the most psychopathic of the subjects were able to tell which was which. Writes Mauro:

    The [subjects] completed the Self-Report Psychopathy Scale: Version III, which measures interpersonal and affective traits associated with psychopathy as well as intra-personal instability and antisocial traits... Overall results confirmed a strong positive correlation between psychopathy scores and accuracy of victim identification. This means that individuals that score higher for psychopathy are better at selecting victims.

	And what was it about these people that made them seem vulnerable? A later study found that the men were picking up on whole suite of nonverbal cues, including the length of their stride, how they shifted their weight, and how high they lifted their feet. Taken together, these cues gave the psychopathic men a rough gauge of how confident their potential victims were. Body language that implies a lack of confidence --- read: socially submissive --- includes lack of eye contact, fidgeting of the hands and feet, and the avoidance of large gestures when shifting posture.

	The researchers' findings confirmed my own suspicions regarding the dubious fellow I mentioned above. The women who wound up on the receiving end of his attentions were individuals who, in their own description, were not very worldly, experienced, or outgoing. They were psychologically vulnerable and hence ill-equipped to either resist this fellow's predations or to deal with them emotionally after they had occurred. In the aftermath, they are so traumatized that even speaking about their experiences is extremely painful. And so the psychopath continues on his way.


https://www.quora.com/What-angers-a-sociopath
	What angers a sociopath?

	...Daniel Fairfield, Functioning sociopath, psychiatrically confirmed and self-diagnosed

	...I absolutely can’t stand it when people are happy but I’m not. It actually angers me. A lot. I said in another answer of mine, that I will not harm a person for fun or anything like that. But I sometimes catch myself trying to manipulate someone’s luck for example I try to influence romantic relationships in a negative but subtile way. It seems like I need to see people unhappy in order to feel better about myself...


	...Being thwarted. A sociopath almost always has a goal, a plan. Anything that interferes with it is apt to enrage him or her...

	...REVEALING WHO THEY REALLY ARE. Logic, reason, questions. Interrupting their scheme or plan...


they tend to think people who fall for their tricks deserve it (this a good article on this? if it worked... http://www.thenewamericana.com/2017/06/20/think-otto-warmbier-deserved-got-might-sociopath/). So the more times they successfully manipulate people the more they will tend to hate those people.

The CNN focus group on Trump supporters (https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2018/01/16/cnn_focus_group_what_trump_supporters_think_one_year_later.html) illustrates how this might work. By all indications, the propagandists behind Trump's rise had a plan to shape the ideology/disposition of those who would end up supporting Trump, and the focus group shows this at work. They struggled to answer basic questions or accept plain facts that reflected negatively on Trump. At the same time, the propagandists responsible for this might see their plan and its methods and simple and routine; it's their day job. Perceiving the Trump supporters as falling for something simple and looking ridiculous because of it would make it easier for the propagandists to look at them with contempt.

the doc appeals to the darkest tendencies and attitudes of sociopaths, speaking to its intent


http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf
	JEWS WILL BE SAFE


apparently "Jews" is code for "members of our organization"


	11. THIS HATRED WILL BE STILL FURTHER MAGNIFIED BY THE EFFECTS of an ECONOMIC CRISES, which will stop dealing on the exchanges and bring industry to a standstill. We shall create by all the secret subterranean methods open to us and with the aid of gold, which is all in our hands, A UNIVERSAL ECONOMIC CRISES WHEREBY WE SHALL THROW UPON THE STREETS WHOLE MOBS OF WORKERS SIMULTANEOUSLY IN ALL THE COUNTRIES OF EUROPE.


sounds like WWI, certainly an economic crisis, And "mobs of workers simultaneously" in Europe is exactly what happened.

They seem to have confidence in their ability to influence economies, and I guess have that ability today--what was up with the recent stock market crash? Or the Russian economy suddenly improving with Putin's rise?


	These mobs will rush delightedly to shed the blood of those whom, in the simplicity of their ignorance, they have envied from their cradles, and whose property they will then be able to loot.


I think a lot of Russian soldiers went back to loot estates after WWI? Bolshevik propaganda said all would get "peace, bread, and land," and said to take for themselves the property of the buorgiose, who they blamed for the war.


    12. "OURS" THEY WILL NOT TOUCH, BECAUSE THE MOMENT OF ATTACK WILL BE KNOWN TO US AND WE SHALL TAKE MEASURES TO PROTECT OUR OWN.


can see this play out after WWI too, one of the more curious things about the war. Sazanov spent the last years of his life in comfort, even though he bore a lot of the blame for starting the war that fueled socialists' hate, and was partly responsible for the Sykes-Picot plan that the Bolsheviks held up as an example of decadent imperialism. The German Foreign ministry, sharing a lot of the responsibility for both starting the war and brining the Bolsheviks to power, were left in power in Germany after the revolution, even though the revolution was fueled by hatred for those who started the war.

Angry demonstrators burned the Okhrana's papers under Kerensky, who himself escaped after the Bolshevik revolution and lived a long life.

There are some hints that Rosa Luxemberg and Rasputin escaped death contrary to reports

The General knowledgeable of the Sarjevo plot, cited by most as the reason for the war, ended up working for Kerensky and then commanding the Red Army.

A lot of Okhrana agents ended up working for the Cheka

probably worth looking at in more detail--how often did suspicious people like these make an improbable escape?


    13. We have demonstrated that progress will bring all the GOYIM to the sovereignty of reason. Our despotism will be precisely that; for it will know how, by wise severities, to pacificate all unrest, to cauterize liberalism out of all institutions.    

    14. When the populace has seen that all sorts of concessions and indulgences are yielded it, in the same name of freedom it has imagined itself to be sovereign lord and has stormed its way to power, but, naturally like every other blind man, it has come upon a host of stumbling blocks. IT HAS RUSHED TO FIND A GUIDE, IT HAS NEVER HAD THE SENSE TO RETURN TO THE FORMER STATE and it has laid down its plenipotentiary powers at OUR feet. Remember the French Revolution, to which it was we who gave the name of "Great": the secrets of its preparations are well known to us for it was wholly the work of our hands.

    15 Ever since that time we have been leading the peoples from one disenchantment to another, so that in the end they should turn also from us in favor of that KING-DESPOT OF THE BLOOD OF ZION, WHOM WE ARE PREPARING FOR THE WORLD.


like that song--"Won't get fooled again!"


I guess they are saying they are good at pacifying unrest and fooling revolutionaries, and this will demonstrate to everyone else that their theories of who should rule are correct. Leading people from "one disenchantment to another," the French Revolution being a good example since it led to despotism. I guess they figure if every revolution ends up being controlled by them and putting another despot in power, people will give up on it.

This makes sense coming from the Okhrana--penetrating and controlling revolutionary groups was their specialty. This could also explain why they hate America so much--it's a counterexample that sticks out.


	16. At the present day we are, as an international force, invincible, because if attacked by some we are supported by other States.


an "international force," like the Bolsheviks were "internationalist maximalists." I guess the Okhrana had to recruit all over Europe and Asia by necessity, and this made them international.

They might have figured the Jewish diaspora was the closest in structure to their group, which could explain why they chose them to take the blame.

"supported by other states"--Okhrana had offices in Russia and France, could refer to that. Probably this group is more than just the Okhrana, or could say Okhrana the institution they infiltrated the most. If it's true they started the French Revolution, it would be obvious calling them "Okhrana" would be a misnomer since the Okhrana was founded 100 years after the French Revolution. The founding of Okhrana might be how they got more substantial support from states. "Supported by other states" could also refer to having allies in high places in European governments.


	It is the bottomless rascality of the GOYIM peoples, who crawl on their bellies to force, but are merciless towards weakness, unsparing to faults and indulgent to crimes, unwilling to bear the contradictions of a free social system but patient unto martyrdom under the violence of a bold despotism - it is those qualities which are aiding us to independence. From the premier- dictators of the present day, the GOYIM peoples suffer patiently and bear such abuses as for the least of them they would have beheaded twenty kings.    

	17. What is the explanation of this phenomenon, this curious inconsequence of the masses of the peoples in their attitude towards what would appear to be events of the same order?    

	18. It is explained by the fact that these dictators whisper to the peoples through their agents that through these abuses they are inflicting injury on the States with the highest purpose - to secure the welfare of the peoples, the international brotherhood of them all, their solidarity and equality of rights. Naturally they do not tell the peoples that this unification must be accomplished only under our sovereign rule.



so I think this is saying:

- people are irrational, unruly and angry at the officials under free governments but docile and patient under dictatorships. And the author's group can use this fact of life to get their "independence" (I guess not being tied to any state?)

- this happens because of propaganda from dictators to their subjects

"It is explained by the fact that these dictators whisper to the peoples through their agents that through these abuses they are inflicting injury on the States with the highest purpose - to secure the welfare of the peoples, the international brotherhood of them all, their solidarity and equality of rights."

Kindof sounds like the Napoleonic Wars after French Revolution, the Cold War after the Bolshevik Revolution--both were controlled by dictators telling them to inflict injury on other states in the name of freedom.

Do they really believe that people can be subdued under "bold despotism" today? or even then? Most of the despotism they have today is based on deception and hiding, not exactly "bold." And even during WWI and the Cold War they'd use bold and overbearing despotism as a catylist for regime change. IIRC Machiavelli's character in "Dialouge in Hell" said something like an efficient despotism can work in secret by fooling people, kindof like "virtual politics" book.

People being more critical of their leaders under free societies could be explained in part by expecting more out of them, expecting their leaders to work for them.


    19. And thus the people condemn the upright and acquit the guilty, persuaded ever more and more that it can do whatsoever it wishes. Thanks to this state of things, the people are destroying every kind of stability and creating disorders at every step.

    20. The word "freedom" brings out the communities of men to fight against every kind of force, against every kind of authority even against God and the laws of nature. For this reason we, when we come into our kingdom, shall have to erase this word from the lexicon of life as implying a principle of brute force which turns mobs into bloodthirsty beasts.    

    21. These beasts, it is true, fall asleep again every time when they have drunk their fill of blood, and at such time can easily be riveted into their chains. But if they be not given blood they will not sleep and continue to struggle


I guess this is saying when people think they have freedom they become unruly, so when they are done they are going to erase "freedom" from public lexicon, I guess kill that idea. I guess like a return to serfdom before all the revolutionary movements for self-government throughout the world.


Why hate ideas of freedom and equality? one guess, goes against their ideas of elitism, would be contrary to idea that some can't let go of that they are destined to rule, special, superior to others. Contempt for the "mob" who fall for manipulation and aren't always rational would also make them dislike ideas of freedom when they see examples of people who don't use it responsibly championing it.

------


	WE SHALL DESTROY GOD    

	3. But even freedom might be harmless and have its place in the State economy without injury to the well-being of the peoples if it rested upon the foundation of faith in God, upon the brotherhood of humanity, unconnected with the conception of equality, which is negatived by the very laws of creation, for they have established subordination. With such a faith as this a people might be governed by a wardship of parishes, and would walk contentedly and humbly under the guiding hand of its spiritual pastor submitting to the dispositions of God upon earth. This is the reason why IT IS INDISPENSABLE FOR US TO UNDERMINE ALL FAITH, TO TEAR OUT OF THE MIND OF THE "GOYIM" THE VERY PRINCIPLE OF GOD-HEAD AND THE SPIRIT, AND TO PUT IN ITS PLACE ARITHMETICAL CALCULATIONS AND MATERIAL NEEDS.


soviets were always weird about religion

one reason they might want religion gone: they methods they recruit by rely on exploiting vices (e.g. you cheated on your wife/husband with a KGB agent and now they can blackmail you), and nobody who honestly believes in religion they follow would agree to the rest of this plan and join up.

I guess this is saying their plan to stir up discontent in people would be hindered by religion.


	4. In order to give the GOYIM no time to think and take note, their minds must be diverted towards industry and trade. Thus, all the nations will be swallowed up in the pursuit of gain and in the race for it will not take note of their common foe. But again, in order that freedom may once for all disintegrate and ruin the communities of the GOYIM, we must put industry on a speculative basis: the result of this will be that what is withdrawn from the land by industry will slip through the hands and pass into speculation, that is, to our classes.    

	5. The intensified struggle for superiority and shocks delivered to economic life will create, nay, have already created, disenchanted, cold and heartless communities. Such communities will foster a strong aversion towards the higher political and towards religion. Their only guide is gain, that is Gold, whichthey will erect into a veritable cult, for the sake of those material delights which it can give. Then willthe hour strike when, not for the sake of attaining the good, not even to win wealth, but solely out of hatred towards the privileged, the lower classes of the GOYIM will follow our lead against our rivals for power, the intellectuals of the GOYIM.


saying they want people materialstic to exploit envy and spread communism

I guess this was big in marxist theory, Lenin's writings, a lot of it talking about upper class controlling and owning more material things than the masses and exploiting this, using this to motivate them to revolt. Can say marxism centered on material concerns--who owns the means of production?



http://xroads.virginia.edu/~ma01/Kidd/thesis/pdf/protocols.pdf


	PROTOCOL No. 5    

	1. What form of administrative rule can be given to communities in which corruption has penetrated everywhere, communities where riches are attained only by the clever surprise tactics of semi-swindling tricks; where looseness reigns: where morality is maintained by penal measures and harsh laws but not by voluntarily accepted principles: where the feelings towards faith and country are obligated by cosmopolitan convictions? What form of rule is to be given to these communities if not that despotism which I shall describe to you later? We shall create an intensified centralization of government in order to grip in our hands all the forces of the community. We shall regulate mechanically all the actions of the political life of our subjects by new laws. These laws will withdraw one by one all the indulgences and liberties which have been permitted by the GOYIM, and our kingdom will be distinguished by a despotism of such magnificent proportions as to be at any moment and in every place in a position to wipe out any GOYIM who oppose us by deed or word.


I guess they are saying corrupt societies require despotism

how about them becoming less corrupt instead... don't they try to increase corruption? Look at what happened to India after Soviet influence, Russia after fall of Soviet Union. author says above more or less that they are going to increase corruption by removing religion--I guess see it as a necessary step toward despotism?


    2. We shall be told that such a despotism as I speak of is not consistent with the progress of these days, but I will prove to you that is is.


sounds like Machiavelli's character in "Dialouge in Hell"


    3. In the times when the peoples looked upon kings on their thrones as on a pure manifestation of the will of God, they submitted without a murmur to the despotic power of kings: but from the day when we insinuated into their minds the conception of their own rights they began to regard the occupants of thrones as mere ordinary mortals. The holy unction of the Lord's Anointed has fallen from the heads of kings in the eyes of the people, and when we also robbed them of their faith in God the might of power was flung upon the streets into the place of public proprietorship and was seized by us.


a positive thing they did? they never really liked monarchs...

but apparently this is part of some plan to replace kings with free societies then replace those with despotism.


	MASSES LED BY LIES    

	4. Moreover, the art of directing masses and individuals by means of cleverly manipulated theory and verbitage, by regulations of life in common and all sorts of other quirks, in all which the GOYIM understand nothing, belongs likewise to the specialists of our administrative brain. Reared on analysis, observation, on delicacies of fine calculation, in this species of skill we have no rivals, any more than we have either in the drawing up of plans of political actions and solidarity. In this respect the Jesuits alone might have compared with us, but we have contrived to discredit them in the eyes of the unthinking mob as an overt organization, while we ourselves all the while have kept our secret organization in the shade. However, it is probably all the same to the world who is its sovereign lord, whether the head of Catholicism or our despot of the blood of Zion! But to us, the Chosen People, it is very far from being a matter of indifference.


claims to be secret organization unsurpassed in deception and political machinations, "reared on analysis, observation, delecates of fine calculation"--didn't the teach theory of active measures to KGB recruits? like had schools for that almost

https://www.marxists.org/history/erol/ncm-8/rcp-agit-prop.htm

https://books.google.com/books?id=h3By77UU4nIC




...


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1905/3rdcong2/35.htm
	 AMENDMENTS TO THE DRAFT RESOLUTION ON PROPAGANDA AND AGITATION{2} 

	 ..Take measures to organise travelling groups of agitators and propagandists to help local centres.


Lenin institutionalized propaganda, was a part of Marxist theory


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1920/nov/18.htm
	Theses On Production Propaganda[1]

https://books.google.com/books?id=jDhNb3EDSNoC&pg=PA89 apparently "production propaganda" is propaganda intended to increase productivity among workers


	2. The leading newspapers, Izvestia and Pravda in the first place, should: a) reduce the space devoted to politics, and increase space for production propaganda; h) influence all the work of the Party and of Soviet institutions, in the sense of mobilising greater forces for production propaganda; c) endeavour to work systematically to place production propaganda on a nation-wide footing, and evolve extensive measures for its encouragement and improvement, with a special view to verifying the successes actually achieved in practice.


reminiscent of Internet Research Agency and Novosti according to Bezmenov--they weren't just putting out propaganda, they were tracking its effects and researching it, too


	...3. In just the same way, work should be systematised, extended and developed in selecting able administrators, organisers and inventors from the masses of workingmen and peasants.

	...9. It is indispensable that engineers, agronomists, schoolteachers, and also Soviet functionaries possessing definite professional qualifications, should be drawn into systematic participation in production propaganda (this in connection with the liquidation of illiteracy).


wanted to recruit from wide range of people




https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1920/jan/25.htm
	Directions Concerning the Work of the Propaganda-Instructor Trains and Steamers[1]

	1) Step up economic and practical aspects of the work of the trains and steamers by including agronomists and technicians in their political departments, by selecting technical literature, films on appropriate subjects, etc.

	2) Production films (showing various branches of production), agricultural, industrial, anti-religious and scientific films to he made through the Film Committee, the film material to be ordered immediately from abroad through Comrade Litvinov. Telegraphic order to be given over Lenin’s signature.


Lenin involved himself in details of state propaganda apparatus, I guess this was for travelling trains and steamers that would go around and show propaganda films

	3) A large-scale volost map to be drawn up demonstrating all the work done and indicating the districts. This map to be exhibited to the public in open places. 


why so open about it? maybe for recruiting?


------




------


https://books.google.com/books?id=qDwsDwAAQBAJ&pg=PT231&lpg=PT231&dq=Kishinev+OR+Kishineff++massacre+Okhrana+OR+Ochrana&source=bl&ots=DBXapdZeIg&sig=g6YspIC_ifOfceZw9AnMiHPHj5I&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwi3gYWiy5nbAhVPuVkKHT0TCb0Q6AEISjAD#v=snippet&q=Okhrana&f=false

